The return of the Czech slalom skier is approaching.
Pavel Francouz was called up to the NHL
Czech ice hockey goalkeeper Pavel Francouz, who is going through a difficult period in his career, is returning to the NHL.
The 33-year-old native of Plzeň will soon be on the bench and could soon score a goal.
The former goalkeeper of Litvinov, Plzeň or Chelyabinsk was injured in the preparations for the NHL last autumn.
He has alternated back and forth in the first half of the game with Vegas, and has yet to make an appearance on an NHL rink since.
The incident happened when the experienced goalkeeper moved from one post to another.
"Pavel Francouz will be out for approximately three to four weeks with an injury to his lower body," the Denver team announced at the beginning of October.
His return to the NHL lasted more than two months.
On Saturday morning, U.S. time, he was called from a farm where he had caught four ducks and showed his old form.
In the AHL, he scored 94.5 percent of the goals.
The Pilsen native wants to finally make it and prove that he belongs in the best league in the world.
In the last season, he had problems with his knees and in the shortened pandemic season, he did not play a single game.
In the NHL, "Francis" has saved 36 games, with a save percentage of 92.3%.
Charles puts Camille in a Christmas dress, William and Kate pose in Jordan
Prince William and his wife Kate have chosen a family photo taken during their trip to Jordan as their Christmas wish.
Prince Charles also posted a picture of himself helping his wife, Camille, to put on her tiara as well.
The BBC news channel reported on its website about this.
They send their best wishes to friends, colleagues and charities they work with.
The photographs were taken in a desert landscape.
The Duchess of Cambridge is wearing a long summer dress in khaki and Princess Charlotte has one too.
Prince William, the Duke of Cambridge, is wearing the same shirt and tie as the Princes George and Louis.
Who took the photograph is not known, nor is it clear when it was taken.
Last year, the royal family posed for a Christmas photo in front of a pile of straw in their Norfolk country estate.
The picture, which serves as a Christmas wish, was also posted by the Prince of Wales and his wife Camilla.
Photographer Sam Hussein captured the moment in June at the Ascot races.
Charles, who has a cylinder on his head and a scarf on his face, helps Camille to match her scarf to her light-colored dress.
Slavia promised Berbatov a million for the title, but Tvrdík denied it.
Prague - Criminal investigators are reportedly working on a corruption case involving the former vice president of the Czech Football Association, Roman Berbr, who was allegedly promised a million crowns for the league title in the 2018/19 season by the Prague-based Slavia.
He informed efotbal.cz that he had gained access to a part of the police records.
The president of the Vršovice club, Jaroslav Tvrdík, stated that the red-and-whites have not committed any corruption.
The server published a transcript of police recordings in which Jan Nezmar, Slavia's former sports director, is mentioned. He was dismissed from the club this summer.
According to the report, a former influential figure in the red-and-white movement was in frequent contact with both Berba and former sports director Roman Rogoza, who is also among the accused.
Police reportedly worked with information that Slavia Berbro promised a financial reward for winning the title.
In 2019, the SK Slavia Praha team won the first league title.
The police agency had knowledge that Roman (Berbr) would have received a million-euro bonus from the SK Slavia Praha officials, according to the server.
According to the criminalists, Berbr not only met with Nezmar, but also with the president of the board of directors of Slavia, Tvrdík.
According to the server, there is no further information on whether the police are still investigating this information.
He denied any involvement in corruption.
Between 2015 and 2017, we actively tried to change the situation in Czech football and offered an alternative to its development.
We never engaged in unlawful conduct, we did not try to influence the referees in violation of the rules of fair play, and we did not provide any financial compensation in this regard," Tvrdík told Seznam Zprávy.
In the recordings, Nezmar is not sparing some of the former Slavia players of dark skin, and he also insults his former boss, Tvrdík.
The police intervention in the alleged manipulation of matches was initiated last year in the middle of October in several places, including the Prague headquarters of the FAČR.
The highest-ranking person involved in the affair is Berbr, who is no longer involved in any football functions.
In the middle of January, Rogoz was released from custody, just like the former sports director of Vyšehrad.
Helicopters, tanks and BVPs are the Cold War's larping.
They will be new, but they will be worse (gunners have to load shells manually from an armoured cabin without cover).
The cars - Toyotas Hi-Lux - are new and good
The backpacks and various armoured vehicles - at a decent level, moreover, it was possible to get rid of the Praga V3S from the specialised units as well.
Planes: combat-worthy but at the end of the rental, transport-worthy but with a short range, but modern.
Drones - few and only small types with no combat potential
Missiles - we have none (but we make and export them)
PVO: middle - undergraduate, outdated; short range - good, modern, relatively good number.
I have such a story.
Honitbu is just next to the city.
The river was flooding and destroying crops, so I was there to help.
When I arrived, I saw that there was a fisherman on the other bank of the river.
I didn't want to do a bordello, so I just sat there and typed away.
I hoped it would go away, but of course a fox came out.
I let her go 40 metres before I decided to pull the trigger.
The poor fisherman nearly fell over, he was so scared, he had a fox on all sides, so I called him and told him it was a fox.
Before I left the store, I was furious.
In other words, I'm looking for a job.
On the other hand, it's not a war, it would have to be a lot of coincidences for something to happen, probably you would see it on a thermal camera that almost everyone has today.
So, in the visible place, you can take what you need and you should be comfortable.
Vojtěch versus Hamáček.
The Ministry of Health has purchased respirators at a much lower price than the Ministry of Health
The state responsible for the purchase and distribution of masks, respirators and face shields has spent millions of crowns in recent weeks.
The iRozhlas server compared the purchases of individual ministries and found that during one day the amounts varied by hundreds of crowns.
Why did prices move so dramatically?
Which agencies acted economically?
And why did they buy the car?
Lenka Kabrhelová is speaking with the editor of the iRozhlas server, Dominika Kubištová.
I respect the army and the military (I am not affected by memories of the former Czechoslovakia), but the Czech Republic cannot benefit from compulsory military service.
We don't have large stores of technology that could be used for training, we don't actually have modern technology for existing professionals, and modern technology is always more complicated, so the skills of reservists will be lost in time.
Modern conventional conflicts will happen very quickly, and there will be no time to re-train.
And in the end, reserve forces/territorial defense are of great importance for countries such as Ukraine, where it is necessary to lead a mass gerilla and it is also a stated necessity to scare the enemy.
In the Czech Republic, only a conflict of such magnitude and intensity would be possible, where the guerrillas would be irrelevant, and we would not have the right geography for it.
We don't have individual skills.
That's not even the worst.
The worst thing is that half of them are playing as if they had it.
Then there comes a situation where you're looking at a guy who's 2 minutes back and he's driving into the empty gate, and you're saying, "What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking? What are you thinking
Of course, they will tax the average tax payer.
It's such a horrible situation for a defender to have to deal with, and I was shocked to see our attacker get past one of their players.
The first butterflies
The Covid-19 pandemic is slowing down, but experts are not expecting any major changes in the coming weeks.
Hospital pressures are expected to remain high for some time, according to statistical models, and a new unknown has been added to the pandemic equation, known as the Omicron variant, which is likely to spread faster than the current dominant Delta.
It is also not possible to say with absolute certainty whether it can cause a more serious course, how vaccination or post-infection immunity acquired from a previous illness can help.
However, this week, the Covid equation also saw an unexpected phenomenon on the plus side: the possibility of treatment.
A new drug, molnupiravir, has arrived in the Czech Republic, which reduces the risk of severe disease and hospitalisation by one-third and can be taken at home.
And soon it should also be supplemented by the drug paxlovid from the company Pfizer, which reports a success rate of up to 85 percent from its previous results.
The first deliveries of molnupiravir to the Czech Republic, however, have also highlighted the question of how prepared the local administration is to accept new drugs in the fight against the coronavirus pandemic.
As stated, the first patients in the Czech Republic will receive molnupiravir from Merck.
The company ended up first because the drug had been developed for a long time in order to find a suitable treatment for viral diseases of horses in South America.
This research is often overlooked that people in the West (Germany, Sweden, etc.)
They are generally less open and less willing to share their opinions.
On the other hand, eastern Europeans, and especially the Czechs, are used to saying "how the beak has grown."
You can do a survey where you ask people if they like Muslims.
Most Czechs will tell you that they don't.
In the West, they will tell you that they love migration, that everyone should help them and that the Czechs are a racist bunch.
And then they vote for parties like AfD.
They are afraid of cancel culture, saying this in public means losing your job and a media lynching.
Then, in polls, it looks good in the west, bad in the east.
But they will find out what people think.
Only Le Pen and Zemmour, both of whom have over 20%, are polling above 20%.
We even know that the objects are three and completely identical.
Identical because of the rotation of units, so that soldiers don't have to relearn where everything is, all objects are the same.
One is the Brdy Atomic Museum and the other two are abandoned.
The SRR did not want to have nuclear warheads on its own territory, either for safety or for the speed of deployment, due to its western location.
In those underground chambers (there are two in each tree) only the heads were kept, not the whole rockets as it is said.
If it was necessary to use this weapon, a special unit arrived to pick it up and mount it on some kind of support.
In addition, the remaining ones are in a deplorable state.
At the elementary school, we had a classmate named Cigán, and we were together for four years.
He was all right, he did good tricks, he often showed off too much, but he was our mascot.
He was known to everyone, he often went out and tried to explain something, he was missing very little, he went regularly, he was involved in sports with us, he didn't steal food, he didn't steal phones, he was clean-cut.
He also went to school in the woods, did various odd jobs, but was always happy, never getting into trouble.
In the eighth or ninth grade, the siblings entered the same class, different classes.
Soon afterwards, the teacher was beaten, often by the police, threatened and harassed other students.
I sell things from time to time (old things, things I don't need, etc) and I've sold to the Gypsies many times. They always had the money, they never tried to take advantage of me, and communication was always easy.
I even sold a car to him, the boy called me every month to say he had paid it off.
I say myself that I am not racist, as long as someone is white, black, yellow, blue or any other colour, as long as they behave in a way that is acceptable in polite society (works, functions, doesn't beat women, just normal behaviour).
But whoever comes, he stretches out his hand, evicting apartments and houses, there is no order around him, he causes problems... so it doesn't matter what colour he is, it will bother me.
I have no problem with African migrants if they come here and start working, start learning the language (not necessarily English, at least), and respect our culture.
If I believe in Allah, it doesn't matter, as long as they respect my traditions and culture, I will respect theirs.
Young woman died in a car accident in Prachatice
"The young woman suffered serious multiple injuries and despite resuscitation efforts, she died at the scene of her injuries," said a spokeswoman for the South Bohemian Rescue Service, Zuzana Fajtlová.
The accident was probably caused by the driver who picked up the girl.
The 18-year-old driver of a Peugeot probably drove in the direction from the village of Žíchovec to the village of Bavorov and then made a U-turn at a bend in the road.
The collision with the Skoda Octavia ended the Peugeot vehicle on the roof of the road, police spokeswoman Štěpánka Schwarzová reported.
The young driver of the Peugeot suffered very serious injuries in the accident.
He suffered multiple injuries and was left dazed in the car.
The patient was provided with urgent pre-hospital care and was airlifted to the Czechowice-Dziedzice hospital in a stable condition, stated the rescuer Fajtlová.
She added that the man in the second vehicle suffered a minor injury to his chest and was taken to hospital.
New rules apply to packages from countries outside the EU, customers often fail to provide details
Lukáš Neuheisl orders from abroad several times a month.
He mainly collects trading cards.
"It's usually tens of dollars, say from ten dollars up, where it's still worthwhile to import, especially from Japan, where the post is often free," the collector explains.
From October, the cost of ordering small parcels has slightly increased, and now the sender must add VAT and the parcel must be handed over to customs authorities.
He will receive an email saying that customs are expecting the package.
All you have to do is fill in the delivery details, and if the trader did not include VAT when selling, the customs authority will deduct the VAT from the total amount of the delivery and transport.
If the recipient does not arrange customs clearance themselves, they must also pay the carrier's fee.
According to Lukáš Neuheisl, however, the whole process is not complicated.
I click one or two of the zippered pockets, insert two pages, and I'm done.
For me, it's usually a five-minute affair, says Neuheisl.
However, not all deliveries are delivered smoothly.
Due to new customs regulations, the daily number of packages received at the Prague post office has dropped from 60,000 to 15,000.
In addition, the Czech Post is also facing the problem that people are not responding to requests to provide the information needed to complete customs clearance.
Currently, there are 30,000 parcels at the international post office that need to be processed.
If people filled in all the information that is required and filled it in on time, we would be roughly halfway there, says Matyáš Vitík, a spokesperson for the Czech Post.
Inflation solution
See the titles to see how you would propose solutions to the current inflation.
Currently, we are at 9.9% inflation and expect it to continue to rise.
What would you say should be done to slow or offset this growth?
We see, for example, in Poland, a reduction in VAT on food and PHM, is this your path?
What do you think will happen when it's inevitable that something will happen?
Prices are rising faster than wages, and it is inevitable that people will not be able to afford basic things, especially energy.
How many did you have to add, for example (the number of employees)?
This year we added 2% in gross, which is a shame, but fortunately I earn the same amount from my business as I do from my job.
Why are convicted criminals sent to prison for just six months?
This head just won't take no for an answer, how can a judge sentence an animal to six months imprisonment just so it can do it all over again as soon as it gets out.
Six months is nothing compared to the trauma the victim will have for years to come, negatively affecting their sexual relationships and overall relationships.
And that's not to mention the fact that the victim of the rape doesn't have to recover from it either.
Will this also encourage potential future reports of sexual assault?
Man from Hrob "threw" his girlfriend from Kostomlat
The man from Hrob unintentionally helped the guards to arrest his nationwide wanted girlfriend from Kostomlat, who was issued a warrant for her arrest.
He called her himself.
But he went for it anyway.
First, he approached a passerby and made up a story that he had been robbed.
The guards arrived on the scene after being called and were shocked when the alleged "robber" told them he had made it all up to get the guards to the scene.
In fact, he only wanted to ask the guards how to report to the Czech Police.
When officers checked the man's identity, they found that the woman was on a national wanted list and a warrant for her arrest had been issued.
The Czech Republic is handling the case.
A sincere question for people here: do you consider our country to be Slavic?
Personally, I think that the Slavs are no longer ethnic or cultural minorities, but I would like to hear your opinion.
Otherwise, of course, I agree with the meme, a shame that Churchill was unable to secure the release of Prague USA :'(
I do not deny that we have a Slavic language.
I don't know, it's a bit of a question whether a rational person can really believe in something without evidence just because it might be beneficial.
I would not personally consider such a case to be right.
I can't agree with Pascal on this, there are at least ten thousand different religions in the world, if you don't count the ones that don't exist anymore.
Which god or gods does the person then choose?
I would say it is quite likely that at least one of those thousand religions has at least one god who will punish you if you believe in a different god.
However, in the tenth commandment it is written, "You shall have no other gods before me."
So it would be more rational to refrain from believing in any god, rather than risk picking the wrong one and having him send me to hell or some such place?
Others: Voluntary training followed by placement in the reserve.
The Swiss model is similar.
X months of training (in various specializations, X months for one) under the guidance of professionals with practical experience.
If you do it well, you can get a professional offer.
Something like this would suit all the members of the Czech Armed Forces.
It could be done in cooperation with the Defence University.
We can talk about this: The collaboration between the education sector and the industry is constantly evolving, companies are recruiting in schools and there is a flow of labour from educational institutions to employment.
Not only during adolescence, but this process is ongoing, each of us is constantly learning something new, moving from one field to another, etc.
There should also be coordination between the civilian and military sectors.
I see it as a way to build a relationship between citizens and the armed forces, an institution that guarantees that no Russian, German or Mongol invasion will ever take place.
It's funny how you view NATO as something carved in stone, we have allies and you will defend us if there is a crisis.
No worries, sir.
One vote in the USA is enough to turn their budget and NATO upside down.
The English exchange us for Russian gold, the Germans exchange us for Russian gas, and the Poles have already proven that they are willing to show their backs and take what they want.
The only thing that has consistently functioned as a guarantor of independence is an army equipped with the military technology of its time.
And today, any teenager can fly a remote-controlled vehicle, so what's not to like?
We don't need border fortifications anymore, it's today's thing, but a teenager with a remote-controlled device will be able to handle it.
How to survive a tsunami in a box
You unwrap the presents under the Christmas tree and suddenly you're home with a pile of wrapping paper and stuffing?
This "waste" is being used again by e-shops, which lack packaging materials.
That's why there's a map of shops that your used boxes will fit into.
And not just for Christmas.
All packaging materials are designed to withstand repeated handling.
That is why it is a shame to treat them like one-off waste.
Anyone can bring a cardboard box, plastic or paper filling to a participating store (there are nearly 150 of them on the KAMsNIM.cz map).
This will help small businesses, reduce the amount of waste created and also avoid the overfilled blue containers.
The shops themselves are also benefiting from the shortage of packaging, as they are saving money on cardboard boxes, which have increased in price by 50% over the last few years.
In addition, we are strengthening our brand with our eco-conscious customers.
One of these shops is TIERRA VERDE, a producer of eco-friendly cosmetics and toiletries.
The boxes and filling materials are transported to Popůvek near Brno by individuals, but we also receive regular deliveries from companies with whom we have agreed to arrange for the collection of the accumulated cartons.
We will use everything we have to pack the parcels from our e-shop.
Individually and collectively, we are creating a more mindful world.
Our wish is to preserve the resources and beauty of nature for future generations, says Petra Lopušníková from Tierry.
The www.KAMsNIM.cz application, however, does not only show collection points for packaging materials.
It's a search engine if you need to get rid of anything (to take away the trash from the house, to hand over the expired medicines, the tires, the worn-out electronics, the batteries, the light sources, the bulky waste, etc.).
All the waste can then go to the right place, and the reusable items will find their second home.
The total map of the project contains more than 100,000 such places.
"Slowly, more and more collection points, re-use centres, textile banks, food banks, charity shops, SWAPs and other places are popping up that help to find a use for things that would otherwise end up as waste," says Miroslav Kubásek, one of the app's authors from the group Ukliďme Česko.
I think it's a shame that in today's day and age, technology is so simple and dumbed down that children who use a computer or a phone are playing games, but they're not learning the basic computer skills.
Recently there has been a problem (mainly in English articles) that university students do not understand the principles of computer components.
Because, for example, Google Photos or Apple's photo apps or even mobile phones in general simply hide the underlying filesystem with folders and everything is put on one screen in the app.
Let them use the technology from a young age, but more importantly, let them learn something.
We will write history, seriously
Emmanuel Macron presented the priorities of the French presidency of the EU - starting in January - and it was grand.
Macron spoke for an hour, during which he unveiled the logo of his presidency, called for the protection of Europeans - in the workplace and on the street - and mentioned so many initiatives that it will take half a year to implement them all.
French politicians love it and so do the voters.
Macron's supporters agree on the need for compromise, but only on Europe.
And in France, there will be new presidential elections in April.
The election calendar also affected our priorities.
The French leader mentioned that historians should write "one history of Europe" and France is ready to provide the conditions for such a project.
Several commentators have already criticized Macron for pro-European propaganda and rewriting history.
In fact, it is trying to prevent history from being rewritten.
The far-right presidential candidate Éric Zemmour is currently touring France with the argument that the Vichy regime, which collaborated with Hitler during World War II, was not so bad and has a lot of success with the French.
Let us take Macron's idea of a history textbook seriously and not pay attention to what is happening in France.
Would it be necessary?
Students in European countries learn history as a story of "us versus them" and never as a story of the whole.
Spaniards, French, Czechs learn who defeated whom in which battle.
But if they don't have a wise cantor, they won't know what the wider context of the event was.
The film of the year is Quo vadis, Aida?
The Czech "mice" did not win.
The story, which returns to the Srebrenica massacre of 1995, also won awards for direction and best actress Jasna Duričić.
At the Karlovy Vary Film Festival, he was at the top of the audience rankings.
The best actor in Berlin was Anthony Hopkins for the film Father.
I'm not very young, I'm not very healthy/fit, and I'm not vaccinated.
It was like "having the flu/being sick" for a couple of days, I didn't really feel like smoking...
It was worse than the common flu.
I don't have a cold.
(Only my personal experience. I don't say everyone has this experience)
Christmas book recommendations
The Christmas number, which will be released on December 20, will contain a traditional literary supplement.
And with her, you will also get cultural tips.
We are also adding this digital edition to our print editions, so that you have plenty of time to buy books as Christmas gifts.
The prose texts that follow on from the previous Petříček Sellier & Petříček Bellot collection.
Another observation of the world and description of everyday things with a poetic sensibility, depth and atmosphere.
In his second novel, photographer Šesták tried to capture the essence of a small town and Czech society.
The story of returning to one's roots, which turns out to be just a mirage.
The Bohemian and the comparative carry the fairy tale of the Red Riding Hood to the stage of the contemporary village.
Its brutality surpasses the popular version and escalates into a horror about emotional emptiness.
And that the path back to instincts is shorter than one is willing to admit
In his last novel, he tells a less sentimental story about returning from exile, something we've become accustomed to hearing.
Those who stayed and those who left know too little about each other to make a common life.
Trains start running according to the new timetable, some drivers change
Trains will start running according to the new timetable from Sunday.
The biggest change is the replacement of train operators on some routes, such as between Ústí nad Labem and Kolín, where instead of Czech Railways, RegioJet will start running.
For most lines, only the departure time is adjusted, and the route may be slightly altered.
There will also be dozens of new trains on the tracks.
The transport companies started selling tickets during the autumn.
Czech Railways plan to run an average of 6,783 passenger trains per day, of which an average of 478 will be long-distance trains.
The trains will travel approximately 118 million kilometres during the new timetable.
The new timetable will also include domestic connections within the EU, such as to Germany, Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, Austria and Switzerland.
The company is introducing dozens of new trains as part of the new timetable.
The main novelty will be the InterJet trains, which will run on the Prague-Cheb route.
The new trains will run on northern Moravia and western Bohemia.
The transport company also plans to increase fares next year by an average of 3.2 percent.
Railways adjust their tariffs annually to account for inflation.
The biggest change to the RegioJet timetable is the addition of the R23 Ústí nad Labem – Mělník – Nymburk – Kolín line.
The transport operator will replace České dráhy after success in the ministry of transport competition.
RegioJet will run a total of 16 trains per day, eight in each direction.
Other changes involve long-distance connections between Prague and Brno, which will also stop at the Havlíčkův Brod, Žďár nad Sázavou and Kolín stations.
Leo Express saved its 16 connections, two return connections to Slovakia and also the weekend connection to Krakow.
According to the spokesman Emil Sedlářík, the transport company tried to keep as close as possible to the scheduled departure times of its long-distance trains despite the planned shutdowns.
Without major changes, the operation of Arriva trains and other operators should continue.
The operator will also change trains on some regional lines.
Passengers are waiting for changes, for example, in Českolipsko, where trains from Mladá Boleslav via Česká Lípa to Rumburk will be replaced by Trilex trains of the German company Die Länderbahn.
Passengers will also be able to use the same ticket for the second year.
Like Czech Railways, their price will increase by 3.2 percent due to inflation.
I disagree.
Do we not learn from the other side?
Everywhere we hear how much they fought for their rights, how they were oppressed and how they had to act, how they died.
In my life I have never heard teaching from the perspective of the slave-owner or from that time, no one defends it, only condemns it.
Nobody tells you in school that black people often sold other black people into slavery and that they were often the worst slave traders.
No one teaches you in school that the colonizers often bought land from the Indians, everywhere they just say how brutally we, the Europeans, slaughtered them, while they were slaughtering each other for a long time.
I've also spent some time in the United States, in both northern and southern schools.
I have not come across anyone who has deliberately hidden facts, but I have heard that it is happening and I think it is a problem, I don't deny it (for example, in Japan, WW2 war crimes are still taboo).
My point was that history is not black and white and that we tend to look at it from a modern perspective without understanding it.
History doesn't care about feelings, it's just what it is and I think it's a fatal error to judge without looking at things from the time.
On the other hand, we should learn from this and never repeat it.
By the way, when we were in those southern states, yes, the Confederate flag and the famous slave owners are quite popular, but on the other hand, they did have some good successes and I found it absurd to dismiss them.
Moreover, the North was not better than it is today, as many people idealize it.
And many people forget that not everyone in the South was a slave owner and many things were against them.
I would not compare this to the Russians, they deliberately omit some facts, lie and manipulate, and our view of them does not exist (there is a video on YouTube of someone speaking about our legionnaires and 1968).
What I found appalling about US schools was the rise of Marxism and the idealisation of communism, something that their country had never experienced.
Overall, I felt that some universities were overwhelmed, the students were too radicalized, and the schools supported them multiple times.
And when I imagine that these people will one day be much older, I feel a bit uneasy that this could be the voice of the majority, because among the young and even in the ruling elite.
I think feminism has already achieved what it set out to do and it's not about the same thing anymore, it's radicalized.
Today, feminists are those who have nothing in common with him and ignore the basic biological facts, which leads to radicalization on both sides, often resulting in opposition to even reasonable things.
The more radical someone is, the more they will be heard.
However, I did not encounter anyone who judged me for colonialism or slavery.
I met bad geography, but it was mutual :D
It's not because I don't like it here, but because it's completely pointless.
I'm proud of something I couldn't do on my own?
In addition, the concept of nationality in general is superfluous from the point of view of any personal identity.
If I have something to do with people, interests, perspectives on the world and shared experiences, not where I was born.
I'm not a believer, but what I do know is that we have two Greek Catholic parishes, one Ukrainian and one Slovak.
The Slovak priest is a really nice guy, he talks more about theology than politics, but he always manages to make a joke about the coronavirus, that everyone is ashamed of.
Then there is of course the Czechoslovak Hussite Church.
Officially they are Protestants, but in reality they are born out of Catholic Modernism and are actually Catholics without a Pope.
I know a lot of Catholics who go to Hussite services because they are theologically very similar, but the members are usually more liberal.
They have a beautiful and historically very valuable functionalist church on Botanická Street.
Otherwise, St. Michael's Church on Dominicans Square belongs to the Dominicans and even on Sundays at 15:00 they hold mass in Latin, just as they did before Vatican II.
The Bethlehem pine cone is in the Czech Republic, the scouts took it from Austria
Břeclav - The Christmas tree lit up in Bethlehem, where according to Christian tradition, Jesus Christ was born, is in the Czech Republic.
The scouts didn't go to Vienna this time due to the coronavirus pandemic, but their Austrian colleagues picked them up at the border crossing Reintal - Břeclav in the morning.
They also took it last year.
The Bethlehem Light is a beautiful Christmas tradition that we look forward to every year, and we are very excited about it.
I am proud that I was chosen, said Amálie Budíková to the present journalists.
Last year, the handover took place at the border crossing of Mikulov-Drasenhofen, directly on the border bridge, but now at the Reintal-Břeclav car park.
But usually, scouts travel by train to Vienna.
Nothing changes in the transport of the spark across the Czech Republic.
The scouts traditionally leave for Bethlehem by train first to Brno, where they hand over the Bethlehem light to the diocesan bishop Vojtěch Cikrle.
The next delivery of light will be handled by scouts on Saturday, December 18, who will travel by both express trains and personal trains.
They will take over the light at the local scout stations or volunteers who will then spread the light across the country, wherever the tracks lead.
This year, the scouts must also follow the current measures to prevent the spread of the coronavirus.
It's the same as last year.
We recommend both courier teams and local event organizers to wear face masks, maintain a safe distance, refrain from singing with colleagues, and behave in a way that is as safe as possible, said Zuzana Hrbková, spokesperson for the Bethlehem Light event.
The tradition of the Bethlehem light, which travels across Europe, was born in 1986 in Austria.
The goal is to spread both the idea of a room, friendship and peace at the same time.
The Bethlehem light is a symbol of hope, light that overcomes darkness.
In the Czech Republic, scouts and guides have been spreading the word for more than 30 years.
The action is backed by hundreds of volunteers, and the flames are also a symbol of purity and humanity.
All the latest news, including a list of places where people can go for a bonfire, can be found on the website www.betlemskesvetlo.cz.
I don't have an economics degree, so I don't know the basics of economics that confirm that subsidies are bad for the economy, but I don't think that the subsidies as a whole would be a problem.
The development of infrastructure, ecology (e.g. water conservation), healthcare and education will properly use the money, but I don't understand why the money is spent on agriculture, industry and firms in general.
As mentioned - it produces unnecessary products and damages the free market and "natural life of the company".
I work in a factory where there are a million pieces of "XY" lying around "xy financed/co-financed by the project xy" and such a company is just a figment of life.
This is not support for a company that gives work to x people, this is a waste of development when this company holds and takes orders from other firms, which could then grow and become more productive.
Absolute agreement, it's terrifying.
Even someone who was born in the Internet age can get caught up in some kind of trick or trap - especially advertising.
I think the internet ads don't bother me, but then I realize that I've been influenced by them - it's just too much of a hassle to resist.
I support radical voices in the European Parliament who currently want to ban programmatic (= targeted) advertising...
It's all a scam, in the words of the class clown - I would ban those internet sites.
I feel that this virus has its roots in (but mostly in point 1):
1. "I won't believe anything that most people believe and it makes sense, I'm not a sheep, I'd rather believe something that is less likely, it doesn't make sense, but it's important that I have my own original opinion which I will say is critical thinking"
2. "I will not believe everything the media says"
3. "I don't trust politicians"
TV has lost the Christmas film trend, this year there will be two hundred premieres
Los Angeles - Television stations and streaming platforms in the United States and other English-speaking countries have fallen out of the Christmas movie trend, and this year they will premiere more than two hundred and fifty records.
He calculated the IMDb film database.
The genre of Christmas family and romantic films has been gaining popularity in recent years and is increasing viewership, so more of these films are being made.
This year, four times more Christmas movies were made than in 2011 and twice as many as five years ago.
The IMDb database, however, only includes those movies with the word Christmas in their titles, so there will be many more Christmas films.
Movies that people traditionally associate with Christmas have been around for a long time.
In Czech, this period is associated with fairy tales, which are popular all over the world, as well as films such as Home Alone, Love Is a Beautiful Thing or the classic Christmas story The Life Is Beautiful from 1946.
The right boom of Christmas pictures, however, started only in 2009, when the American cable television network Hallmark launched a special film series. This was reported by the BBC.
Her Christmas Countdown project, which included four films, was very successful.
This year, the station started its viewers on December 22 and will present a total of 42 Christmas films.
Lifetime's rival network, Lifetime, has 35 new Christmas-themed movies this year, and popular streaming platforms like Netflix are also contributing to the total.
"In this magical time of the story, it doesn't matter so much what's going on in the background, it's important that there's a lot of Christmas trees and it's snowing," said Brandon Gray, author of the book I'll Be Home for Christmas Movies (I'll Be Home for Christmas Movies).
"For the audience, it's a form of escape and a way to feel a little bit of calm in the midst of all the craziness and the craziness of the world that we've been living in the last couple of years," Gray added.
According to him, for example, Hallmark uses the same recipe for its films, which is uniform but successful.
You have two people who fall in love, but then there is about half an hour before the end of the evening when there is some misunderstanding, but it is resolved successfully and the two of them fall in love.
That's the way it's going to be until all the movies look the same and have the same atmosphere, Gray says.
Mazepin had a positive test for COVID-19, and will not take part in the final race of the F1 season.
Only 19 drivers will take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix in Formula 1.
Nikita Mazepin had a positive test for COVID-19 and will not race in the last race of the season.
The Haas team will only run one car on the track.
In the last race of the season, he was aiming to improve on his 20th place in qualifying.
However, Russian Nikita Mazepin from the Haas team will not reach the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
He was tested positive for COVID-19.
Only 19 cars will appear on the starting grid, with Mick Schumacher from the last row starting on the track, while Max Verstappen, who will face Lewis Hamilton in the title fight, will start from the first row.
Mazepin is according to Haas' statement relatively okay and does not show any signs.
Nikita is physically fine as he was asymptomatic.
It is now in isolation and will follow the advice of public health officials, with safety being the overriding priority for all involved," their representatives for formula1.com said.
Haas is not sending its reserve driver to the race, nor can it.
The substitute would have to complete a qualification or drive in another part of the weekend.
The first competitor to not be affected by COVID-19.
Kimi Räikkönen, who was finishing the season, had covid-19, last year Sergio Pérez and Lewis Hamilton were tested positive.
They can also close you for this.
And everyone will be robbed, the boss said.
In terms of the law, COVID-19 is listed as a contagious disease.
So, in the same group as HIV, smallpox, measles or typhus.
§ 152 Spreading of Infectious Diseases
(1) Anyone who intentionally causes or increases the risk of spreading a contagious disease to people will be sentenced to six months to three years in prison, a ban on activities or the confiscation of property.
(2) The perpetrator will be punished for two to eight years.
c) fails to perform an important duty arising out of his employment, occupation, position or function, or imposed upon him by law.
d) causes serious harm to health.
(3) The perpetrator will be sentenced to three to ten years' imprisonment if the crime described in paragraph 1 causes serious injury to at least two people or death.
(4) The perpetrator will be sentenced to imprisonment for a period of five to 12 years if he or she causes the death of at least two people by committing an act specified in paragraph 1.
Quiz: Why failing companies often have women in charge and what your boss should never ask you
The gender pay gap, i.e. the so-called gender pay gap, has been one of the highest in the EU for a long time in the Czech Republic.
Which country has the biggest differences?
And in which age group and in which sector do women earn the least money?
Check out what you know about pay equity.
Gold, silver and 150 diamonds: The price of the most expensive diamond will amaze!
It's a little like bespoke jewellery, and he's put in half a year's work and all his savings into it.
"I had a vision of what I wanted to create, but I didn't have a lot of experience at home," says Liban, who spent 3,000 hours over the course of half a year on his project.
The silk was bought in Italy, the 24-carat gold thread in France and the Swarovski crystals were delivered by the company.
The silver stars were adorned with 150 diamonds.
"The basic material is wool and linen, but silk adds a touch of luxury," the creator praises his work, which he, however, does not recommend washing.
And it has one more twist.
"I'm completely out of money, I have to sell everything as quickly as possible," says Lebanon.
If he succeeds, he will set a world record.
The previous most expensive wedding, sold five years ago, cost only 720,000 crowns.
If MZ is detached from reality and doesn't care - he will let the bad circle flow and exchange it for a new one.
The fact is that the departure of FB from Europe would very much help its non-Russian parts (which are affected by the current crisis).
I think it would clean up the social climate a lot.
It would also clarify the channels of "brotherly aid" from the Soviet Union to some of our political parties and leaders.
Then, people who choose to do so should also have a clear idea of what their interests actually are.
It's a shame that it doesn't have its own TikTok.
Many young people would suddenly realise that the sun was shining outside...
Trump directly urged the suspects to turn themselves in, promising to harvest whatever they had.
On the situation in the United States with the leading African-American reporter.
In the United States, new cases of police violence are emerging, this time during nationwide protests.
The protests that followed the killing of George Floyd by a police officer sparked a debate about systemic racism, police work and cases of police brutality against black Americans.
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks with one of the leading African-American journalists, reporter Adam Serwer of The Atlantic.
But what would that increase in funding mean?
The union is taking money from us in the form of pensions.
If it doesn't stop, we won't have the money.
I really don't see how the EU taking away our money would cause us to use it for something else...
You can argue that the money from those grants could have been used better, but that's a whole different discussion.
Is it possible for a business to evade taxes?
Is it possible to tax a business?
After all, if some piece of meat goes through a veterinary check, it must be recorded somewhere and it can't just disappear, can it?
Prazdroj and Jelínek do not produce special alcohol for the black market.
However, they often don't give me an invoice or take it away and throw it away right away.
The government approved sending up to 150 troops to help Poland.
Women, scouts and drone pilots could leave before Christmas, the mission has been approved for six months.
They are helping their Polish colleagues to protect the border with Belarus and to build the planned fence.
Poland officially requested NATO assistance in relation to the several months long actions of the Belarusian regime, which invites citizens of nearby countries with a false promise of easy crossing of the EU border.
British and Estonian soldiers are already stationed in the Polish territory.
Is the Omikron mutation spreading in southern Moravia?
Hygiene is investigating another case of a child from Adam's.
"We have another suspicion of this variant in another child from Adam's class.
There is no direct contact with previous cases from ZŠ Adamov," said Ciupek.
Six cases have been reported in the region in the past week.
"We are still waiting for official confirmation of the variant in our six cases - it is being carried out by the National Reference Laboratory for Influenza and Non-influenza Viruses of the State Health Institute in Prague," the director said.
She added that it was two nurses from the Brno University Hospital and two children of one of them, as well as two 11th grade students from ZŠ Adamov.
There is no connection between the cases from Brno and Adam's.
Three of them have mild symptoms, four have no symptoms at all.
No one was suspected of having Omikron abroad
None of the individuals listed travelled abroad, nor did any of their families, and no one has been in contact with anyone who was abroad.
There is no connection to the swimming world championships, Ciupek said.
The head of hygiene, Pavla Svrčinová, previously stated that an international water polo tournament was being held in Brno a few weeks ago.
Players from South Africa and one Belgian player became ill after returning.
California will restrict the sale of firearms.
He wants to act like Texas when it comes to abortion bans.
California Governor Gavin Newsom announced a plan to ban the sale and manufacture of certain weapons through a legal mechanism used by Texas in its controversial heartbeat abortion law.
Victims would then be entitled to compensation from anyone who manufactures or sells assault weapons in California.
Newsom's announcement comes in response to Friday's ruling by the U.S. Supreme Court, which upheld a nearly 50-year-old precedent that established the right to abortion nationwide, roughly up to 24 weeks of pregnancy.
However, the court did not rule on the constitutionality of the entire law, but rather on a technical issue arising from the innovative construction of the measures.
The ban was therefore transferred to the public, which prevented the Texas Republicans from attacking it through the usual legal channels.
"I am outraged by the Supreme Court's decision yesterday (Friday) to allow the Texas ban on most abortions to remain in place and largely support the Texas maneuver to protect its law," California governor said.
"If states can now block federal courts from reviewing their laws, then California will use this power to protect human life," Newsom continued.
He reportedly appointed them to work with the state parliament and the justice minister to come up with measures that would allow the public to seek a ban on assault weapons and so-called spirit weapons.
These homemade weapons, which lack serial numbers and can be used to circumvent regulations, are marked as such.
Newsom wants to give "private citizens" the right to sue for at least $10,000 (over 220,000 CZK) in damages from anyone who manufactures, distributes, or sells assault weapons, parts for "ghost guns," or kits to make them, in California.
"The most effective way to keep these deadly weapons out of our streets is to create a threat of private lawsuits, and we should do that," the California governor said.
The AP notes that California has banned the production and sale of some military-style weapons for decades, but a federal judge blocked the ban as unconstitutional in June.
Now that the ban has been reinstated using the Texas model, liberal Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor, who dissented in the 7-2 majority opinion, warned against expanding the mechanism to other states.
The Supreme Court, however, did not fully immunize Texas from legal challenges and allowed abortion clinics in the state to continue filing lawsuits against certain officials in the South.
Each emergency vaccination has its public testing phase, where the vaccination schedule is gradually worked out and the vaccines themselves are improved based on the results.
For example, Israel has already been studying the effects of four doses.
And according to these studies, most patients experience a fivefold increase in antibodies, which has a long-term effect.
It's just like every other vaccination, it will have its own schedule, but it's too soon to tell.
Another fact is that a new vaccine based on inactivated virus is expected to hit the market soon, according to the manufacturer's specifications, which promises up to 10 times greater efficacy.
The amount of homework can be left alone.
But to re-evaluate CO is to learn.
Since the time of Marie-Thérèse, our civilization and technology have progressed a bit, and it doesn't make sense to write down phone numbers and fill out textbooks in notebooks anymore; it's a waste of time.
In these matters, it would have been possible to take a brutal beating.
On the other hand, how many people will leave the base with some basic financial literacy?
And what other things will we need for life?
How can I legally watch the Champions League online?
Do you know if there is any online service in the Czech Republic that would allow me to watch the Champions League for a fee?
We have Netbox and pay for the sports package Telly for the Spanish and English football leagues.
However, it does not include the UEFA Champions League.
I think O2 offers the Premier League, but I don't want to change my TV and internet provider.
Poland threatened to halt payments to the EU budget
According to Ziobra, the European Commission would be acting against the law if it used its new powers to stop the payment of money to Poland.
The commission has postponed approval of Poland's plan to draw 36 billion euros from the EU's coronavirus recovery fund to revive its economy hit by the pandemic.
And it is under pressure from the European Parliament to go further and use a mechanism to claw back EU subsidies from countries that flout the principle of the rule of law.
"Poland should respond to this blackmail from the EU by voting with one voice on all issues that require unanimity," said Ziobro, head of the small Solidarna Polska party, without whose votes the current government would lose a narrow majority in the Sejm.
"Poland should also consider its obligations in the EU energy and climate policy, which is leading to a drastic increase in energy prices," Ziobro added.
If the dispute continues, I will demand that Poland stop its contributions to the EU.
It would be justified, the Polish minister said, given that the EU is unlawfully withholding funds from us, which we also contribute to the common budget.
Its stance on the EU is more radical than that of the ruling party, the Conservatives.
The changes to Poland's justice system during Ziobro's tenure threaten its independence and subordinate it to politicians, according to the European Commission.
Brussels, according to Ziobra, is trying to create "impossible conditions because its goal is not a legal state, but a change of government in Poland."
Warsaw is facing "a political diktat imposed by intimidation and the attempt to overturn the democratic decision of several million Poles," Ziobro also said.
He said Poland should be a member of such an EU that is based on the partnership of sovereign states, not on the rule of the strongest and the Brussels bureaucracy, which is not under democratic control.
He said his party would never accept any concessions from Brussels that would limit Poland's sovereignty.
"We will never agree to make Poland a colony," he said.
But you can identify it... In Lidl, they have one type of cheese in four different places.
I didn't look for anything else, I just looked for yogurt, and I needed just cheese, Parmigiano Reggiano, after ten minutes in the dairy cases I gave up and asked.
They had them all, the less common and more unusual cheeses, but it was between the vegetables and the dairy-free zone...
If I'm excluded, I won't go to any market, I won't go to any action, I won't go to the golden shop on the square, but they don't have such a choice, but they have everything I need and they have a certain order, so I can finish in ten minutes.
To Lidlu so that I can take a break.
And that's all I care about.
I've been following this for two years, and most of the opponents of vaccination are just a little bit more extreme than most of the supporters.
The rational discussion is taking place at an expert level, but extreme views are making their way into the public sphere.
Keep moving forward, one step at a time.
Binary thinking: Vaccines will save us, vaccines are useless.
Everything to ban, everything to allow.
Instead of robust analysis, we have colour-coded charts.
Comparing apples to oranges.
That's how that state is and that's how we are.
But the data collection methodology is different in those two states, and no one is addressing it.
Fuj, I'm relieved.
Sorry for the inconvenience and have a nice day to all.
As a child, they punished me with a pot.
Never was it because of the marks, mostly it was just that I repeatedly refused to listen and got angry (I read instead of going to sleep, washed the dishes etc).
I was never punished without warning, my mother would always threaten me first, saying that if I did it again, I would get a slap (sometimes even after I had already been scolded).
Only after I repeatedly refused to listen did I get a few slaps on the buttocks (over my clothing).
I personally think physical discipline (in a reasonable manner and degree) is beneficial because children react to it much more than to words.
I think the warning part is important because it gives the child the choice of whether to listen or not and if they don't listen they will get punished.
I just needed to be warned to start listening.
Defense of the system
When renowned Czech lawyer and constitutional court judge Vojtěch Cepl was asked by a journalist in 1999 what the Czech constitution meant to him - whether it was a sacred document that was sworn to and taught in schools, or rather a contract that could be changed if necessary - he unequivocally chose the first interpretation.
We agreed in the constitution on democratic rules of our life, which also define who we are as a state and its citizens, and it is better to change them.
Imagine: some nations have their own rules that they love to follow.
Just like Czechs love pork and sauerkraut dumplings, Vojtěch Cepl asked the question.
However, in recent years, there has been a growing opinion among lawyers that the Czech Constitution needs to be changed.
The years are tested by situations that its creators (to whom Vojtěch Cepl belonged) could not predict, such as the behavior of the elected president.
However, Cepl was right in one thing.
What we know about such documents is that political interference in their texts must be deliberate.
It needs to be understood and actively defended, only then can it be the key to managing most of the crises that societies face across history.
The constitution is, among other things, a set of rules of conduct for politicians, setting out the rules of the game for them.
We fear that it will be abused against minorities or individuals, so we are binding restrictions.
At the same time, constitutional texts also allow politicians to exercise their power.
Covid doesn't choose, a few-month-old kitten is fighting for its life in the FN in Brno
While the coronavirus is generally milder in children, there are also serious cases that the hospitals are dealing with mainly in recent times.
"We know that children are more vulnerable and affected less than adults, speaking of 2 to 5 percent compared to adults," said Dr. Petr Dominik, head of the Department of Pediatric Anesthesia and Resuscitation at the University Hospital Brno and the Faculty of Medicine of Masaryk University.
The course is usually much simpler, lighter, and often occurs without symptoms.
But children are those who are most severely affected by the coronavirus, as we can see in recent times," said Dominik.
According to the doctor, there are dozens of children who need mild supportive care.
It's taking place at the Children's Infectious Diseases Clinic.
Very seriously ill children with coronavirus are only recently being admitted to ARU.
Children with post-COVID syndromes were monitored by a doctor throughout the year.
"Now we are seeing an increase in children with acute COVID-19, which means they have pneumonia and need to be on a ventilator," he said, adding that the illness affects both adolescents and infants.
Children are also being admitted to hospitals due to the coronavirus.
"We currently have babies of all ages and adolescents here," the doctor said.
However, she is happy that the children's hospital in Brno has not yet recorded any deaths from the coronavirus.
According to available data, six children aged 0 to 14 died in the Czech Republic on December 6.
According to Dominika, a psychologist is an integral part of the work in the children's hospital – not just on the coronavirus ward.
It also points out that just like adults, children also benefit from vaccination, as it reduces the severity of the disease and reduces the incidence of post-COVID syndrome.
"That is why we also recommend the vaccination dose for children," the doctor added.
In the quiet zone, you can only walk along the marked paths.
But the quiet zones aren't that big.
They are visible on the tourist map on mapy.cz.
In national parks outside the quiet zone, you can go anywhere (but don't cross the fence into the fields).
Skiing/cycling in the forest outside marked trails is not allowed anywhere unless you have an exemption (but of course, it is not monitored in national parks).
How does the conductor practice?
Music is going through my head, Josef Kurfiřt laughs.
He was originally a woodwind player and played the oboe in the Liberec opera.
As a singer, he can sing practically all repertoires, and as a conductor, he not only works in the Liberec F. Šaldy Theatre, but also in Plzeň, in the Josef Kajetán Tyl Theatre.
He collaborates with the Hradec Philharmonic, the Film Philharmonic or the Podkrkonošsky Symphony Orchestra.
China is building the impression of being able to handle the outbreak and the authoritarian regime is facing a crisis better
Sinologist Jirouš: China is building a reputation for dealing with epidemics and the authoritarian regime is facing a crisis better.
China has launched a medical and political offensive.
Beijing has been criticized for failing to contain the outbreak, which has turned into a global pandemic.
Now the country is reporting zero new cases.
States including the Czech Republic are competing for Chinese protective equipment and Chinese doctors are helping in the fight against the virus, for example in the most affected Italy.
How do you feel about Beijing?
Is it friendly support or is the communist regime trying to improve its image in the world?
Your friend says to you: Do you want an elephant?
I have it and it's great.
The wife is happy because she is mowing the lawn, washing the car, and playing with the kids.
Well, it's just a parade.
If you want to buy a donkey for 5000,- I will sell it to you.
Friend: That's it, I'm going to make a lot of money...
At some point they meet and the one who bought it complains: what the hell did you sell for a elephant????
The lawn is overgrown, everywhere there is a huge tree, the car is crushed, the children are fighting and the wife wants to get a divorce.
He says, "You're talking badly about elephants, you won't sell an elephant...
World events are controlled by the powers that be.
Despite the equality of sovereign states, it is the great powers that determine the course of international affairs.
Europe can only become a great power if it works on its integration.
It is currently at the level of economic and political integration (in certain areas), but military integration is still lacking.
Personally, I think Europe is heading towards federalization.
It won't be for 10, 15 or 20 years.
But maybe in the middle of the century the mood will be different and it will work out.
I thought about it and it is possible.
I'm not an expert in Czech, so I may have made a mistake.
I just take the fact that an ellipse usually includes 2 different units on the same level.
I'll take an example from another comment, "Spanish oranges and mandarins," where it's clear that they're both from Spain, whereas with "Spanish fruit and mandarins," it's not clear that they're from Spain.
In addition, I base this on the fact that the sentence says "all American forces," including their weapons, and I know that American complexes are operated only by Americans.
In other words, I expect that it is already included in the broad concept and there is no need to further specify it for the American forces.
But again, maybe just the wordsmiths :D
It's either way, it's a nonsensical request
An earthquake of magnitude 5 was recorded in Tokyo.
A 5.0 magnitude earthquake hit Tokyo and surrounding areas on Sunday.
Witnesses said buildings shook in the city, but there were no reports of damage.
No tsunami warning was issued, Reuters reported.
Vicki Holland from Britain tortured a squirrel called Milly
The disturbing footage shows the moment the terrified monkey curled up in a toilet bowl as its heartless owner laughed and splashed water on it.
Hollanda also fed the birds, kebabs and hamburgers, regardless of her actual nutritional needs.
The Gwent Magistrates Court has now banned the woman from keeping animals for life, according to The Sun newspaper.
Wildlife experts caring for Milly, who was abused by her keeper, have said they have never seen such a distressed animal.
Milly spent almost two years rehabilitating at Monkey World in Dorset and now plays happily with another rescued monkey called Moon.
The mother of four admitted to two counts of causing unnecessary suffering to a protected animal.
She was sentenced to 12 months in prison, suspended for two years, at Newport Crown Court.
Hollandová was also sentenced to 120 hours of unpaid work, a life-long ban on keeping animals, and must pay 12,000 Czech crowns in court costs.
Team leader Steph Sawyer said: "Milly is doing well but her rehabilitation will continue."
Milly took a while to get used to people again.
She cowered and hid from everyone she met and any loud noise or sudden movement would cause her to scream.
Opička refused to eat for a long time.
Now that she has settled and is happy with her mate, she can still provoke panic in new people.
The psychological scars from the abuse will follow her for the rest of her life, says Sawyer.
The abuse of Millie was exposed after police in Gwent found disturbing footage on her phone during a raid at her home following allegations of drug use.
In the footage, Milly is heard swearing in a vulgar manner.
In the next video, Hollando says she is offering cocaine to the monkey and says, "Do you want cocaine?"
That's how my fingers itch.
In May, with her partner Russell Cox (43), she admitted to having cocaine with the intention of selling it.
Cocaine was found hidden in Kinder eggs in his home, valued at £1,600 (around 50,000 Czech crowns).
Cox was sentenced to 30 months in prison and Holland was given a suspended sentence of 20 months.
And what amazing concepts do you learn three times over when you courageously jump over the 20th century?
Will you bring the same things to first grade as you did in sixth grade?
And that kills the idea of biflow, where no one cares if you know or understand it.
Mainly to write the test for 1 and then it doesn't matter to anyone else.
Run down the street and randomly ask people if they can solve a quadratic equation and its coefficients.
Everyone has gone through it, and the absolute majority will shrug and say they have no idea what you're talking about.
So what are they learning?
I'm a big fan of general knowledge and the fact is that people don't want it and don't need it.
And at that moment it is pointless and you will never get it.
Some of it is learned for the many people who will need it.
But as I said, the note that you don't need to do anything on the machine, I thought it was serious... ...because you don't need to.
And we are slowly getting to the time when knowing them is a sign of punk.
(We probably owe our communist past and the persecution of intellectuals and elites, but the price we pay for that is high.) But the price we pay for those machines is high.
If journalists could count, they probably wouldn't have reached these numbers.
Wedding bells: Kadri and Andrey's war continues!
This is the main reason why Switzerland cannot leave," Andrea answered in an Instagram story to curious fans' questions, who were disappointed that she decided to end all contact and even block them on social media.
From the beginning of the experiment, Kadri and Andreou have been at each other's throats.
The main problem was that Kadri was living and working in Switzerland and his idea was that Andrea would move out, at least until he returned to the Czech Republic permanently.
She, however, resolutely refused to do so.
And as can be seen, their relationship did not end in love, but rather grew into mutual contempt and hatred.
It was an attack planned by you! Kadri was outraged by Andreino's accusations of lying, gambling and debt.
Kadri's ex-wife didn't like his younger sister Linda either.
He decided to publicly defend his brother.
I don't normally talk about such things, and we never talked about such things in our family.
I don't want to stir up any regrets.
But when I see someone trying to publicly hurt and defame someone I love so much, it just breaks my heart!
I'm sorry I have to do this, but I wanted to publicly thank my brother Kadri for his character and for helping our family when we needed it most, even though he was so young.
I find it more frustrating when I have to read such false information, which is probably taken out of context.
I would like everyone to know Kadri as I do, our close friends and family, who are standing up in response to Andrey's words.
I am really grateful for everything!
People will believe what is written, but the most important thing is that we, his family, love him and know the truth and know what really happened.
The drunk burglar climbed up the facade to the fifth floor.
You won't believe why.
Chao started his burglary spree at a parking lot in a residential area, where he tried to break into several cars.
According to available information, the driver managed to steal from one of the vehicles in the amount of approximately 330 Czech crowns.
He didn't think of anything better than to climb up to the fifth floor and enter the apartment through the open window.
He stole two bananas.
From one security camera, he is seen walking away from the scene of the crime and eating a banana.
When the apartment owner woke up in the morning, he discovered that the bananas were not where they were supposed to be and called the police.
It was then detained by Cchaa.
He admitted to consuming alcohol on the day in question.
And because he needed money, he decided to steal while drunk.
The matter is still under investigation.
The drunk climbed up the facade to the fifth floor, where he stole two bananas.
The pandemic law is time-limited and is tied to pandemic readiness.
When it is repealed, the law will no longer be in effect.
The law, however, restricts the scope of business
That's not enough for you?
Gathering will be restricted, but not banned.
Over 60 percent of voters turned out for the local elections
New councils were elected in the villages of Komňa on Uherskohradišťsko, Lužice on Mostecko, Nová Ves on Liberecko and Rovná on Pelhřimovsko on Saturday.
The number of councillors in these towns fell below the statutory minimum or the elected councils split up.
A total of 99 candidates competed for the 28 seats on Saturday.
The average age of the newly elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69 years old, the youngest is 33 years old.
The processing of the results of the Saturday elections symbolically closes a rather demanding but successful year for us.
Four new or repeated elections to municipal councils took place, and the highly anticipated election to the Chamber of Deputies was also held, said Eva Krumpová, vice president of the Czech Statistical Office.
She recalled that due to the COVID-19 epidemic, the elections were more demanding in terms of equipment and personnel security.
In Komna in the Uherskohradišť region, the Association of Independent Candidates won the weekend elections with 27.76 percent of the vote and two seats in the seven-member council.
STAN candidate received 24.84 percent of the votes, which means they have won two seats.
Two seats in the council were won by Občané pro Komňu, who received 18.52 percent of the vote.
The former mayor of the village, Jana Křižková, who is a member of the Association of Private Practitioners, has also been elected to the municipal council.
Komňané – independent candidates – achieved one mandate in the municipal council.
75.48 percent of eligible voters cast ballots.
The group Pro Rovnou won in the village of Rovná in Pelhřimov.
It received 50.50 percent of the votes, which means four seats out of seven.
Two representatives from the Association of Independent Candidates 1 and one from the Association of Independent Candidates 2 also got elected to the town council.
Turnout was 93.62 percent.
The Lužičtí a Svinčiceové (Lužičians and Svinčians) alliance, led by Mayor Jindřich John, won the elections again in Most.
He received 56.73 percent of the votes and, like in 2018, he has four mandates in the seven-member council.
The second candidate for Obec pro lid, which received 43.27 percent of the votes, will have three representatives on the town council.
76.7 percent of voters cast their ballots.
The independent candidates Naděje pro Novou Ves won the election in Nové Vsi in Liberec.
The association of independent candidates received 59.88 percent of the vote and won four of the seven seats on the municipal council.
ANO received 40.12 percent of the vote and increased its number of seats in the regular elections in 2018, and now has three.
Voter turnout was 42.9 percent.
The State Election Commission will discuss the election results on Monday.
They will then be published in the Collection of Laws.
What do you think is the bigger problem?
A dead civilian or a foreign politician?
I think that all the things that people are writing to you are good.
He's playing the fool to get someone to talk to.
If not, then it's sad.
I don't think Christians are degenerates, or anything like that.
I even like a lot of church architecture from an aesthetic point of view (which was the point of trying to make them look good).
And it doesn't matter who believes in what.
On the other hand, I find it amazing how much power the Church had in the Middle Ages, how much money it spent, how it suppressed science, etc.
Notwithstanding all the wars she caused, e.g. the Thirty-Year War
Tl;dr: Believe in the spaghetti monster, but the church and state have nothing to do with each other.
The man fell head first from a height of 12 metres.
The concrete survived.
The unbelievable fall survived a man in Ostrava on Saturday night, where rescuers from the regional Emergency Medical Service intervened.
Workers at the regional emergency operations centre took an hour after midnight to receive the initial information about the man who had fallen from a height.
Two ZZS crews immediately left for the scene – a medical and a nursing crew.
When the medics arrived at the scene, they discovered that the 28-year-old man had fallen from a height of around 12 metres and hit his head on the concrete!
In Vítkovice, they are mining for coal.
But not in the way they should have, and the firefighters went anyway.
When the rescue teams arrived, the man was unconscious with multiple injuries and in imminent danger of death.
The emergency doctor intubated his airways, provided artificial ventilation and transported him in an ambulance to the trauma center in Ostrava, where the spokesperson for the ZZS Moravian-Silesian Region, Lukáš Humpl, informed.
I'm more worried about the public's and authorities' inadequate reactions than the coronavirus
The spread of the coronavirus in the Czech Republic means a challenge for politicians and civil servants, but first and foremost for doctors and medical personnel.
How serious is the situation from their perspective?
We spoke to military doctor David Řezáč.
Editor: Matěj Válek Research: Tomáš Roček, sound engineer: David Kaiser, music: Martin Hůla
Legendary Nunes falls after seven years, Oliveira retains belt
MMA had a great night full of exciting results.
At UFC 269, things were happening.
The outsider Julianna Peña managed to defeat the legendary fighter Amanda Nunes, who had been looking for a challenger for seven years.
Charles Oliveira defended his featherweight title with a great submission against Dustin Poirier and retained his belt.
Kai Kara-France also won, knocking out Cody Garbrandt with a technical knockout in the first round.
He also defeated Sean O'Malley.
A surprise that no one expected.
It brought the women's bantamweight fight between the legendary Amanda Nunes and Julianna Peña into the spotlight.
The American entered the bout as a kind of "wimp," since Nunes had not lost in seven years and was grinding her teeth for another victory.
The beginning of the duel was also in the spirit of paper-based assumptions.
Nunes started her journey to victory in a big way, and even delivered a push kick to her opponent, sending her to the ground.
However, she did not allow herself to be pushed into making another mistake and unsuccessfully tried to attack with a punch to her opponent's hand.
The second round was thrilling for MMA fans.
Both competitors traded a slew of impressive strikes and hard jabs.
She also gave Nunes a place to land, where she started to dig.
She had to give up the fight and retreat.
The American woman caused a huge shock when she became the new champion.
The main event was a battle between Charles Oliveira and Dustin Poirier for the lightweight title.
At first, things were going better for Poirier, but the cards started to turn against him.
In the second, Oliveira tried to be more active, trying to hit his opponent with a karate chop to the shoulder.
It didn't work out for him, but afterwards he put a lot of pressure on his opponent, got him on the ropes and knocked him out with a flurry of punches.
He won the second round thanks to this.
In the third round, Oliveira showed a rear naked choke, which Poirier resisted for a while, but then had to break free.
The Brazilian then defended his title, while Poirier lost after two years.
In the next fight, Sean O'Malley earned a dominant victory, landing a hard right to the jaw of Raulian Paivu in the first round.
He then received a series of precisely aimed blows and recorded his fifteenth victory.
Kara-France then got some advice from Cody Garbrandt.
Nunes celebrated another victory with her little daughter, now after seven years she has lost.
That vertebra, or those vertebrae?
At first glance, it doesn't seem complicated.
Most common Czech names express only one grammatical gender, so it is not a problem to determine whether they are masculine, feminine or neuter.
There is also a fairly large group of nouns whose gender is not fixed.
Such significant names are shared between the two genders.
When conjugated, they take on two endings and in some cases remain in an ungendered form.
For example, the words "svízel" and "kyčel" are masculine and feminine, in the first they follow the pattern of "stroj", in the second they follow the pattern of "píseň".
For another group of nouns, the forms are different in the first person singular, for example: "řádek/řádka", "kedluben/kedlubna" or "brambor/brambora" (in the sense of food).
Both forms are standard, have the same meaning, and are therefore interchangeable.
Some words may vary regionally, for example "okurka" in the Czech Republic and "okurek" in Moravia, in this case the Moravian variant is ungrammatical, as are other Czech-Moravian pairs such as "příkop" and "příkopa", "kobliha" and "koblih" and so on.
Some words that have entered the Czech language from other languages were originally non-inflected, but have since adopted Czech endings.
A typical example is the word "image," which is masculine and feminine, or the word "buffet," which remains in the middle gender but has endings according to the pattern "grad."
Turkey has opened the door for migrants to Europe.
What is the situation at the Greek border?
There is tension on the Greek-Turkish border due to the increasing number of migrants trying to reach Europe.
Thousands of people began to cross the southern border after Ankara stopped protecting them.
European politicians promise Greece support and the Czech government is also preparing humanitarian aid.
What motivates people to take the uncertain journey?
And what is the situation like on the ground?
We haven't seen blue skies for three months and we're suffering, says Sydney journalist
Four months of devastating bushfires have killed almost 30 people and hundreds of millions of animals and destroyed millions of hectares of land.
How are the authorities and the locals coping with the disaster?
Could the Morrison government have done more to avoid the drastic consequences, critics say?
And what will the country have to prepare for in the future in relation to climate change?
Lenka Kabrhelová is speaking with the Sydney journalist Ika Detrichová.
False accusations are always rare.
That is why it is always written everywhere.
It is unpleasant to deal with sexual violence in our society, and how widespread it is, and they are trying to cover it up.
I don't personally know anyone who has been falsely accused.
I know a lot of people who have been sexually assaulted and I've seen how their loved ones or the police often treat them.
The victims should always be believed.
The trend has been that victims are finally opening up about their trauma.
But people don't leave it for themselves enough.
There are also those who falsely accuse someone.
It's disgusting and it's pandering to the idea that "most of the accusations are false" and that it's a "trend" that helps sexual predators.
Czech Republic is flooded with unfinished houses, families can't afford to finish
Construction material prices have risen more than 30 percent in the last few weeks and months.
A number of people found themselves in a precarious situation.
It does not have the means to complete the construction of the family homes and the bank refuses to increase the mortgage loans.
In addition to the cost of materials, construction costs are also increasing.
Therefore, people do not have enough money to finish the already built family homes.
In many cases, banks refuse to increase home loans, which creates an extremely unpleasant situation.
In the best case, people move into completed and unoccupied homes.
In the worst case, the houses are uninhabitable and families are forced to sell them because they cannot afford to pay their mortgages and rent," says BHS economist Štěpán Křeček.
We will build two to three family homes this year and fifty percent of them have already been sold.
For us as a construction firm, it's difficult because we have to abide by certain things in the contract, even though the materials have gone up.
So we are doing it without profit," said the owner of the construction company Zdeněk Slivoň.
Many people will only have financial problems.
If they had expected the house to cost five million, it will now cost seven.
I think some will be waiting," Slivon added.
The most expensive items were the copper, iron, and the installation and welding equipment.
But construction companies are also struggling with a shortage of workers.
There are shortages of graduates in construction trades in the Czech Republic, and the influx of foreign workers is slowing the spread of the pandemic.
The situation regarding the issuance of building permits is currently favourable.
"Building authorities issued 7,675 building permits in October, which is almost 10 percent more than last year," Křeček explained.
We are doing well and we will do even better.
However, the real vision is lacking, says the ČRO commentator – MujRozhlas
In addition to the traditional New Year's celebrations, politicians have traditionally used the occasion to make speeches.
This year, the nation's leaders have spoken to the nation, including Prime Minister Andrej Babiš and President Miloš Zeman, as well as the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the Chamber of Deputies.
What did we learn?
Just like my diploma, I have my own topic, which I chose myself, I'm continuing my bachelor's degree, I always do this for a whole year and then I write the written part in two weeks to two months.
The aircraft are completely silent, as long as there is no total macaque and something is left in his head, the committee will not bother him with theory.
I learned statecraft for a week, and when I was at the end, the commission always tried to lead me to some logical deduction, which I immediately understood.
Otherwise, to those projects, we know people who will pay someone to do the semester project (we did it a lot, it was really useful, and we learned a lot) and then they just learn the project and they have it done.
I think it's great when the exam at the end of the course is based on the knowledge gained in the project, not just the defense.
But don't email or call the embassy and don't send any packages to the embassy.
You'll be just like them.
Those people at the embassy have nothing to do with those people.
And if they were against Russia, they would have risked a lot, so they may have to play with them, otherwise something could happen.
But you can also build a similar statue of Putin next to the mouse.
Třebas should give him a pat on the back or something.
I agree, even though Insta is kicking artists under the table.
Once you post stories and at least one picture every other day, your reach drops to absolute minimum.
In addition, it changes what is more important, likes, comments or storage.
I've been really scared lately, so maybe I'll have to slow down to TikTok, where a lot of artists from my scene are doing well and they don't want to stop.
Ultimately, I would be happy if there was something more user-friendly, something that didn't detract from the artists' creativity and energy.
The statement of the Labour Party on Donbass
The picture - yes, the breakup - no, they express their opinion on the breakup of the USSR.
Thirty years since the illegal break-up of the USSR.
On 8 December 1991, the largest geo-political catastrophe in the history of mankind took place.
On December 8, 1991, Boris Yeltsin, Leonid Kravchuk and Stanislav Shushkevich, without any legal authority and in violation of the results of the referendum of March 17, 1991, signed a treaty, without regard for the people, that "the Union of the Soviet Socialist Republics as a subject of international law and as a geopolitical reality ceases to exist."
One stroke of the pen "destroyed" a huge country with almost three hundred million inhabitants.
Hundreds of thousands of ethnic Russian citizens were left stateless after the collapse of the Soviet Union.
Since the beginning of the 1990s, the population of Russia has decreased by ten to eleven million.
Even without the loss of the Nerushe population, we have already lost more people than in two world wars combined!
The same people who destroyed what had been built in the Belovezhskaya Pushcha for the past seventy years have betrayed the socialist camp (created by the sacrifice of millions of lives in World War II and the Great Patriotic War).
They deliberately deindustrialized, slowed down agriculture, broke away from the largest world power, which had previously been economically linked in a single mechanism.
If we look deeper, we see population decline, the collapse of the economy, science, the army, crime, inter-ethnic conflicts, the war in Chechnya, all the conflicts in the post-Soviet space, the Orange Revolutions, NATO's expansion to the east, the war and the collapse of Yugoslavia, the Arab Spring, the war in Syria - all of this is the result of geopolitical capitulation, first of the socialist camp, and then of the Soviet Union.
There is such a concept in political science as "the power vacuum."
Everything that was rushed and surrendered was quickly filled and occupied by NATO countries, which accepted our geopolitical capitulation.
And the world is still reeling, mainly due to events of the late 1980s and early 1990s.
The price of a product sold in a supermarket with a large turnover does not necessarily correspond to its quality and quality.
It's Monday and we have some meat in the supermarket that costs 189 Kč / kg.
I'll buy it and put it in the freezer and make it into a dinner on Thursday.
In an alternative reality, where I don't buy meat on Mondays, it will be reduced to 99 CZK/kg on Tuesday - explain to me the mechanism by which this change in the price of meat will become a problem for my digestive system?
Or I'll wait until Thursday and the meat will cost 69 CZK / kg - which is different from what I bought on Monday for 120 CZK and left in my fridge for 3 days?
I will answer myself - nothing.
Those cheap things that are supposed to be good, are obviously bad, defected, or of poor quality. I'll tell you the truth ;-)
Yesterday I went to Hlavaty in Brno and a lady was handing out some flyers, which I always take to help the volunteers, they can't get rid of it...
No, the pamphlet was full of peasant wisdom and conservative views on the workings of the world, but nothing about God, I was confused, but I knew it was some kind of propaganda.
After reading it, I found out who was distributing it and eventually it led to Scientology.
No, because it was a good mattress, full of useless lessons, as if I had to learn and not be bitten.
Paper saves trees, so the forests wouldn't have to be cut down.
I've been through something similar with a former girlfriend.
Psychological manipulation and emotional blackmail will force you to give in to that person because you love them and you don't realize how much power they have over the situation.
She threatened me several times to hurt me because I went out with a guy she didn't like.
Or when I wanted to leave her apartment earlier, she got angry and asked me not to go anywhere.
Then she started to physically block the doors.
For a year, it was a great relationship, but then it went downhill for another six months.
Then I ended the relationship with her because I told her I was leaving and she lied to me but I can still talk to her next week to calm her down and make sure she's okay.
That person sucks out your city, your emotions, and overall joy.
Better to hold back
When insurance companies are competing to buy the fog of tests and the hunt for positives, who would know about the deadly disease without the test?
The only thing we're achieving is complications for companies, transport companies and others, because their employees have been locked up for five days in their own homes.
In the west, they stopped and acknowledged that there is no cure for a disease weaker than the famous flu.
Unfortunately Válek is new and needs to add something and boost his ego by coming up with buzz words.
I'm looking forward to seeing our old friend again.
After several years of decline and suppression of this nefarious business, MLM recruiting is once again back in the spotlight.
I was one of the recruits, I tried to learn (I was 20, a freshman at university), but the initial promises of product knowledge and business skills quickly turned into "you don't care about this, just find people."
I was interested in the products I offered because I wanted to help people, but the training was more about how to scare and humiliate people.
When the first earned money came, a person quickly realized that in order to make money, he had to hit a few certain products every month.
Investment life insurance and mortgages were the only sources of income, so people felt like door-to-door salesmen.
What can I say, the experience was valuable, people learned not to jump to conclusions and to verify information thoroughly.
I didn't throw any of them into one bag.
People in this business are successful and even beneficial to others, but they will not be bragging about expensive consumer goods or "fat" accounts.
I have never worked in a corporate environment before.
HR is in a state of calm, managers are looking after their management, and power is not wasted on us.
So, regular evaluation is happening, in the form of what's going on with us, it's pretty good (set some goals for the next year, look back at what went well and what didn't) - it's more of a self-evaluation, rather than someone else evaluating you based on some numbers, and similar.
Company events are also optional.
But we are also a bit unique within our company - we have departments that are more "corporate".
Sometimes you feel like you're almost a startup, squatting in the offices of a big corporation.
But it doesn't really affect us until the results come in.
The Czech woman missing in Britain has died.
Her body was found in London.
Nearly a week of British police searches have failed to find a 32-year-old Czech woman who went missing in late November.
On Saturday, December 12, the Minister of Foreign Affairs, Jakub Kulhánek, announced on social media that a woman from Uherskohradišť was found dead.
British police today confirmed to our embassy in London that they had found the body of the Czech citizen who went missing.
The cause of death is being investigated.
We will not be releasing any additional information at this time.
Kulhánek expressed his sincere condolences on Twitter.
The woman was last seen on November 28th, getting off a bus on her way home from work, before withdrawing money from an ATM.
Her disappearance was reported by colleagues five days later.
The London police began to search for her, and Interpol added her to its list of wanted people worldwide.
It was also found in the Czech database of missing people.
Police have already detained one man in connection with the incident.
What role she played and what she was suspected of, she did not reveal.
Four towns elected new councils at the end of the year
On Saturday, 11 December, new councils were elected in Komňa, Uherskohradišťsk, Lužice, Mosteck, Nová Ves, Liberec and Rovná, Pelhřimov.
The number of councillors in these towns fell below the statutory minimum or the elected councils split up.
In the new elections, 99 valid candidates ran for 28 seats.
Voter turnout reached 62.41%.
The highest turnout was recorded in the village of Rovná, where 93.62% of eligible voters voted.
The mandate received a total of 8 women and 20 men.
The average age of elected officials is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69, the youngest 33.
A total of 13 candidate lists were registered for the upcoming elections in the four towns.
Thirty-six women and 63 men ran for 28 council seats.
The average age of the candidates was 46.6 years.
The youngest candidate was 22 years old, the oldest 72 years old.
The processing of the results of the Saturday elections symbolically closes a rather demanding but successful year for us.
They held four new or repeated elections to municipal councils and above all very closely watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies.
We had to work in more demanding epidemiological conditions, which placed greater demands on equipment and personnel security, said Eva Krumpová, 1st Vice-President of the Czech Statistical Office.
The last polling station was processed on Sunday 12 December at 03:49.
On Monday, the State Election Commission will discuss the results of the vote and once approved, they will be published in the Collection of Laws.
That is the biggest problem I have with the whole pandemic.
It took me a while to get over the fact that I had a very dangerous contagious disease, but it went by without any major problems.
I have a problem with the majority of the population treating this like it's no big deal.
I'm looking forward to getting vaccinated (tomorrow!) because thanks to this I will finally be less dependent on others.
He would be stripped of his presidency and his ability to regain it.
However, the chance that it will actually happen is very small.
In addition, I am not sure if it would be possible to consider the act of shredding the document as an act of treason.
Velezrada is a crime against the sovereignty, territorial integrity, or democratic character of the state.
It must have been something more serious.
How the pandemic has affected intimacy: The number of people aged 35 and under who are not having sex has increased
More and more young adults in the United States are living their lives without sex.
It is mainly made up of religious people, according to the Daily Mail website.
The survey showed that from 2008 to 2021, the proportion of people aged 35 and under who gave up sex rose from eight to 21 percent.
Women aged 18 to 35 who said they had not had sex in the last year are more common than ever before.
Other factors also contribute to the decline in the number of sexually active individuals, the Institute for Family Studies (IFS) has shown.
One of them could be the economic impact of the coronavirus and the higher unemployment rate.
But media, social networks and video games can also make sex seem less and less important to young people.
"Since 2010, the proportion of men and women aged 18 to 35 who say they had no sex in the previous year has been rising," said IFS researcher Lyman Stone.
For those in marriage, sexual activity is more common, with only 5% saying they were sexually active in the last year, compared to 2021.
For the free people, it was 29%. Stone added that marriage before the age of 35 is only a small percentage.
The lack of sexual activity is also due to the fear of premarital sex and the religious foundation.
Despite the fact that married people are more likely to be sexually active, the percentage of married and cohabiting women aged under 35 continues to fall.
Young people's attitudes to pre-marital sex are divided, with about 30% saying it's a bad thing, while about 70% think it's okay.
"It's true that in this age group, the free-agent population is a minority, but their behavior is moving that trend," Stone said of the 30 percent.
Most of those who have a moral problem with premarital sex have a religious reason.
Since 2008, the proportion of young adults aged 35 and under who attend religious gatherings more than once a month has increased from 20 to almost 60 percent.
The percentage of "non-believers" has risen from 10 to 20 percent," Stone said.
Other factors contributing to the decline in sexual activity include less social interaction and more social drinking of alcohol during the pandemic.
The study also showed that the likelihood of sex is lower for people without jobs or with lower incomes.
Another reason may be the expansion of digital media, which apparently reduces the need for sex.
People are spending more time online, which is "replacing" this need.
This trend has been particularly pronounced during the lockdown period of the COVID-19 pandemic.
The mandate to vaccinate against Covid is about whether a society should force people to do things they don't want to do, but which could save their lives.
It's a pretty tough question, and one that I'm personally most interested in the social conscience.
In other words, if we don't order them and they die, it will be our fault.
My argument is that we could certainly have blamed an 80-year-old man who didn't really know what he was talking about, misheard some misinformation, and as a result didn't get the vaccine and ended up dying.
On the other hand, I don't think we can blame the death of a staunch opponent of vaccination, who was alongside the SPD and the KSČ in something about discrimination and totalitarian state.
From the statistics I mentioned, it is quite clear that the majority of pensioners who are not vaccinated probably belong to the second group, so they will have to pay for it themselves.
No snow in the Czech Republic.
How will a mild winter affect the battle with drought?
This winter, in the Czech Republic, one of the smallest snowfalls in recent years has occurred.
Ski area operators will not be able to avoid technical snow, which can even complicate preparations for the Jizerská padesátka ski race.
Is it a trend or an exception?
And what will a lack of snow mean for the fight against drought in the Czech Republic?
I have one story, but it's not about a knight in shining armor.
One day our teacher led us through the whole city to the dock so we could ride the boats down the river.
We walked down that wide street and didn't see anyone in the middle - Hare Krishna followers.
Of course, they crashed into us.
I was luckily able to escape, but with one of my friends.
When she left, we asked her what she said to them.
"They asked me if I wanted to save my soul.
I told them I didn't have a soul," she said.
Everyone, including the teacher, was silent all the way up to the dock.
We are so overwhelmed.
It's not much, but the system is breaking down, says Orozovič
New German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw on Sunday after previous visits to Paris and Brussels, where he was greeted by the country's prime minister, Mateusz Morawiecki, with military honors.
"We are opening a new chapter in our relations," said Morawiecki at a joint press conference following the talks.
Scholz stressed that Europe must make it clear that it will not accept the violation of Ukraine's territorial integrity.
The crisis caused by the disturbing movements of Russian troops near the Ukrainian border should be resolved with the help of diplomatic efforts, including within the "Normandy Group", which brings together France, Germany, Russia and Ukraine.
Morawiecki said the chancellor had been informed about the situation at the Polish border with Belarus, where its leader Alexander Lukashenko has artificially created a migration crisis and uses people as human shields and weapons every night.
The Prime Minister was discussing further sanctions against the Lukashenko regime and its patrons in the Kremlin so that they finally understand that we are determined to defend the eastern border of the EU.
Scholz, according to the DPA agency, assured that Warsaw is benefiting from German support in the dispute with Belarus, and condemned the inhumane treatment of the Lukashenko regime towards the protesters.
The drunk nun caused the accident, she tried to cover it up
The car returned to the scene of the accident, but the driver was a different nun who was trying to take the blame on herself.
When the police told her that she could lose her driving license for giving preference in driving and for causing an accident, she came out with the truth, said TVN24.
She admitted that another nun had approached her asking for help.
The police then went to visit Celestine's sister.
They then took her driver's license away after discovering she had over two per cent of alcohol in her blood.
They also announced that they will be held accountable for their actions in court.
Hugo is doing what he can.
Juraj Šajmovič, however, did not overlook his film.
Czech filmmakers have been inspired by American dog-love stories.
But they forgot the most important thing: the rules of filmmaking.
After the Forrest Gump-like film, Gump - a dog who taught people how to live - is now taking on the audience's emotions in a new film called We're Watching.
The screenplay co-author and director Juraj Šajmovič Jr. freely continues his previous film Tady hlídám já from 2012.
The talking dog, Hugo, returns to the stage along with some familiar faces.
Julie and Ivan, the owners of the Šumava pension, which is on the verge of closing, will start to attract peacocks, Julie's father and his partner, and especially her daughter Veronika.
She is no longer a little girl, but a growing young woman who is experiencing her first love.
The director and his partner Beatriz Šajmovičová (who is also the film's producer) had problems telling the story in their previous film, but at least the children and the dog were entertained.
This time, the creative duo wrote a weaker script that evoked a mix of fear and feelings of dread.
Let's sum it up.
Although Julie is a scientist, she is susceptible to witchcraft and if the right "constellation" occurs, she will mate with her forest engineer Ivan, wherever the coordinates are set - on the hood of a car or a church tower (of course, during an excursion with a local guide), the veteran colonel Mojmír will shoot his own daughter (Julie), who falls into a coma, whereupon the family is taken to a hospital in the heart of the Šumava, where the miraculous cure of the dog takes place.
Nothing against nature's healing power and the strength of animal lovers.
Their owners know why they have them.
The viewer gasps as to what a message full of dubious situations and figures was needed for this.
Two staff members, a forest rogue, a police officer arriving on the scene to look for drugs, and a discussion about the strength of bone marrow soup - and of course, the family in the pension are all drunk.
When the heroine wakes up from a coma and sits down at the dinner table with a cigarette in her hand, asking for her father's whisky and a glass of water as a vegetarian, you can't help but laugh.
The creators also explain to the viewer that "it sometimes happens in a coma."
The Šajmovič team lacks basic dramaturgical knowledge of text, the ability to build a plot, a sense of character and direction.
The performances are uneven, the editing is disjointed and the overall impression is disappointing.
While Lukáš Vaculík, Jitka Ježková and Nela Boudová try to save their parties, they have little to play with.
The only flaw of the film remains the poetic shots of the Bohemian forest by cameraman Vladimír Holomka and the pair of deer.
It's not enough to sketch out a few characters, a convoluted plot and a lot of dog-whistles, let alone the vulgar language the characters use.
The argument is not that the membership in the Goat Breeders Club - as in the case of the producer - is not transferable.
With good intentions to promote nature and friendship between man and dog, one must also have knowledge of the craft, if one wants to tell a believable story.
In this case, it didn't work out.
There is a little too much eroticism and minimum sentiment for the genre.
Even as a commercial for cantharaphy, this amateurish piece would not have passed muster.
Yes, respect, because they have to listen to constant abuse from people like you.
There is a difference between offering and coercion, and here you can see how that works, but that is only because you have never tried it.
The decision is always up to the customer, if they don't want it, the answer will always be no.
If you had listened to that advice, you might have changed your mind.
It's work like any other, in this case a gig for extra cash.
The near east is experiencing unusually dry months.
It is the only time of the year when it rains.
"Almost complete absence of rainfall in November, as we have seen on some stations, is unusual," the Israel Meteorological Service said.
For example, Kfar Giladi, a village in northern Israel, reports only six percent of its long-term rainfall in November.
The two-day rainfall this week was more of an exception.
It's good for us.
It had been dry for a long time.
It was the right Christmas star, said Wasim Ashkar, a resident of Nazareth.
Rains in Israel occur almost exclusively in the winter months, are sudden and irregular.
The forests are dependent on the winter rain.
Without them, they are dry and prone to fire.
It is not just about the forests, but also about water supplies and irrigation for farmers.
The largest freshwater source in Israel, Lake Galilee, has this year been filled to the brim thanks to three consecutive wet winters.
Since then, the level has been falling.
Water managers have been warning of the drought for years.
"It is expected that due to global warming and climate change, rainfall will decrease here," said Uri Schor, a spokesman for the Israel Water Authority, in 2018.
Israel is helping to develop technologies such as desalination or wastewater recycling.
Economically weak countries such as Lebanon, Syria and Jordan are worse off.
In the streets of the capital of Jordan, Amman, the number of cisterns is increasing.
Water and private wells are drying up.
"This year, orders have increased by seventy to eighty percent compared to the previous two years," Imád Sulejman, the driver of a tanker truck, reported in September.
Clashes broke out between farmers and security forces in Isfahan, Iran.
The reason for the protests was the drought.
The local river was completely dry.
The region has had the driest November in many years.
Israel is preparing a military strike against Iran
Israel's defense minister said the Vienna talks did not bring "any progress" and that he had informed Washington about preparations for an attack on Iranian nuclear facilities.
Defense Minister Benny Gantz said on Saturday that he ordered the Israeli army to prepare for a military strike against Iran, according to Jonathan Lis.
Gantz, who lives in the United States, is trying to persuade Americans to escalate their pressure on Iran, but also informed Washington of military preparations.
During a press conference in Florida, Gantz said that nuclear talks in Vienna have "not made any progress" and the world powers "understand that Iran is playing with them."
This happened to me about three years ago.
I flirted a little and grilled him during the interview to find out what he really wanted.
In the end, I discovered that my suspicions about the pyramid were justified.
Because I really don't like those underpants, I hesitated for a moment with doubts and questions and then thanked her and left.
Feel free to tell me I'm a moron, but a pyramid is a pyramid and financial advisors are financial advisors.
Skiers headed to the mountains over the weekend, hoping for plenty of snow and good weather
Mountain resorts in the Czech Republic have seen their first major surge in demand for skiing over the weekend.
After a heavy snowfall at the end of the working week, there is no longer any need for snow chains, and some ski resorts have already begun operations.
The skiers were not deterred by the obligation to present a COVID-19 certificate at the checkpoints.
While ski rental shops are not worried about the lack of interest from customers, some are reporting weaker demand for their services than before the pandemic.
Thousands of people went skiing in the Liberec region over the weekend.
The skiers were treated to good weather today, with sunshine and good snow conditions.
"We are happy that the opening weekend really started from the Thursday evening skiing, when we had the first skiers on the slopes," praised the director of the Ještěd Sports Area Jakub Hanuš.
Hundreds of people also headed to the Jeseníky for the first day of the new season.
For example, the Ski Arena Karlov or the center in Branná in Šumperk were open.
The weekend attendance was very good, with an estimated 400 people attending on Saturday and today.
The conditions are unfavourable.
The sun shone, it was minus three degrees, so it was perfect, praised the representative of the ski resort in Branná Rostislav Procházka.
Ski resort operators can only sell lift passes to people who are vaccinated or who have recovered from Covid-19.
With the exception of a few people, people are prepared and are showing the necessary documents, said René Hroneš from the Špindlerův Mlýn drawing centre.
"We only recorded incidents," he added.
Some ski rental and equipment shops are reporting lower demand than before the pandemic.
The demand for ski hire is fortunately high.
It is not like in the past, but there are still customers, said Alexandra Bokišová from the Skiopava store in Opava.
There is expected to be greater demand during the ski course period.
The director of the Královéhradecká Snowbear company, David Šinták, also feels that due to the coronavirus, there is not as much interest in renting ski equipment as there used to be.
Before the pandemic, we were already almost on the verge of being rented out.
Compared to the period before the pandemic, we are about 50 percent, Šinták told ČTK.
People have become lazy and learned to sit at home, according to him.
On the other hand, the rental agency in the Novako area in Boží Dar is seeing a large demand.
They started renting skis there a week ago and now customers have to reserve them in advance.
"We start renting bikes this weekend, but people have already been calling ahead, so we expect a lot of interest, as we did last year," said the manager of the park, Pavlína Nováková.
Interest in the ski school is comparable to the period before the epidemic.
If we want successful and wealthy people to stay in the country, they must have the opportunity to live a quality life as they do abroad.
Socialist healthcare is not included, where it is often difficult to find a dentist or specialist doctor.
The smart and well-connected people who have no property in the country leave.
The company's owner will not just leave the country.
But I completely agree with the rest.
If these people do not live well in the Czech Republic and if these people do not have a reasonable future in the Czech Republic, then they will not live in the Czech Republic.
The emigration from Hungary began when Orbán won a beautiful day, ruled for a year and then the annual emigration rose by a few thousand.
It is naive to think that the Czech Republic can never find itself in such a position.
Another question is the election itself.
When you live here, you can also win some traditional V4 crazy people.
The young and educated will leave, but its supporters and the people whose property cannot fit into the plane will remain.
Awful photo!
Langmajer in the blood because of a bet on beer?
While autumn was in full swing in the Czech Republic, the film's production team, led by Jiří Langmajer (55), took advantage of the tropical weather in Thailand!
The actor posted a photo of his bloody face on social media.
Is it a real injury or is it just for filming?
The London police are still looking for the missing Czech woman.
She was last seen on her way home.
"Petra's disappearance is not at all like her behaviour and we're starting to worry about her," said Lucy O'Connor from the police station in Lambeth, where Srncová worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and simply wants to know where she is," she continued.
The Czech woman left work on Saturday, November 28, around 7:45 p.m. and headed home to Camberwell.
It was reportedly last seen about half an hour later in a bus.
Her disappearance was reported by a colleague on December 3.
Srncová worked as a "nursing assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are extremely concerned for our missing colleague Petra, who is unaccounted for," a group of medical facilities tweeted.
"We would like to appeal to anyone who may have any information that could help them to get in touch with police," the statement continued.
The public is also being urged to get involved in the case, with Harriet Harman, the MP for Camberwell and Peckham, drawing attention to it at a press conference on Saturday.
"She has been missing for several days, she is only 32 years old, she is from the Czech Republic, her parents are obviously devastated," Labour MP said, holding a photograph of the woman distributed by the London police.
"I feel that we all have a huge responsibility to try and find her, because she was out of her home country, away from her family and she was working here for our healthcare," Harman said.
Police have already detained one man, who remains in custody.
However, the BBC news website has reported that police have not released any information about his identity or what he is suspected of.
Russia cannot occupy Ukraine, and certainly not with 30 BTG (about 5 divisions).
I do not underestimate Ukraine either.
That is not "a lot," but about 8 percent of the Russian army.
Notice that Ukraine is constantly repeating that the threat of invasion is exaggerated and that our entry is full of teeth.
I quoted above.
I don't know what he thinks Russia wants to do.
War is a costly pastime and Russia has a higher GDP than Italy.
Compared to the situation in 38, I have no idea where to start.
I can compare it to the First World War and the "annexation" of Sicily:D
I can imagine that after Ukraine announced that it would not abide by the Minsk agreements, Russia would annex the crazy republics.
That is exactly what the "concentration" at the borders would correspond to.
That is, pacta sunt servanda...
New bus timetables come into effect in Prague from Sunday, mainly affecting suburban routes
Passengers in Prague's integrated transport (PID) are waiting for several changes, which mainly affect suburban connections.
New lines were created, some changed their route, and others disappeared.
Mladoboleslavsko is now being integrated into the integrated system.
In the capital, the express trains from České Budějovice stop at the Zahradní Město station on weekends.
The S7 trains will run on the route from Beroun to Český Brod, passing through the Prague main station.
The newly opened station Prague-Zahradní Město will now stop the R17 rapid train from České Budějovice and Benešov.
PID will be expanded to other areas.
In addition, the buses go as far as Světlá nad Sázavou, Blatna u Jesenice, Staré Splavy and Turnov.
Buses will be added to Mladoboleslav including lines that cross into Liberec and Hradec Králové regions.
When the integration takes place, 77 lines will be cancelled, 37 new ones will be introduced, and the operation of 12 existing lines will be improved.
The new bus line 405 will depart from Zličín in Prague and go all the way to Žatec.
A new direct connection between Prague and Kralovice u Rakovníka has also been established, which replaces the cancelled line S53.
They will run in the morning peak and on weekends, a new express line number 404 will depart from Prague to Rakovník.
The lines 400 and 410, which run to Liberec County, have been added to the PID system.
They depart from Střížkov metro station, not from Nádraží Holešovice station.
The main line 400 runs through Mělník, Dubá and Česká Lípa to Nové Bor and some of the trains continue to Rumburk or Cvikov.
The 410 supplementary line goes through Mělník, Dubá, Doksy, Mimoň and Jablonné v Podještědí.
On the other hand, the new operation has been cancelled or restricted on dozens of local tracks in central Bohemia, including Mochov, Dobříš and Rožmitál pod Třemšínem.
All trains leaving Prague at 02:30 have been cancelled.
Due to the modernization of the railway, long-term restrictions will remain in place on the Prague – Beroun, Prague – Lysá nad Labem and in the vicinity of Kolín.
Changes are also in store for passengers at other locations.
Buses replace some of the cancelled railway lines or extend the line 420 from Dobříš to Prague, where PID tickets can be used up to Milevsko.
The routes of lines 540 to 543 in Nymburk have been changed, and the routes of some buses on the border of Central Bohemia and Hořovicka in the Plzeň Region have been altered.
Healthy lunch/dinner from the supermarket
Hello, I work classic 9-5 with a 30-minute break and my only option to get food is to go next door to Billy or a bit further to Lidl.
Since I have no movement, I don't have the strength to exercise, so I have to eat as healthily as possible and diet.
Unfortunately, I never know what to buy and I always buy the maximum amount of pizza, yogurt and apple.
Question: What would you recommend I buy in the supermarket to stay healthy without thermal processing?
Not everyone is waiting for a foot of snow like you are, unfortunately.
And it's not the trees you have to see.
Only the tip of the tree can be hidden in the snow.
If it is damaged, the tree may be more susceptible to fungal diseases.
I don't think it's the only reason we're not allowed to ride off-road, but it's one of them.
Dary's admission on Ned's relationship: I didn't expect this at all
The Czech show business pond will not survive anything other than the revelation of the relationship between Dara Rolins and Pavel Nedved.
They have been together for years, and the famous footballer even broke up with his girlfriend because of the singer.
Dara now sent a lengthy message to her fans, explaining why she kept her love for them a secret for so long.
"I can say that there is no one in the Czech Republic or Slovakia who would not be ashamed to admit that Dara caught a bear, pardon, Nedved," Dara Rolins, who is in love with the Czech Republic's most successful footballer, jokes.
However, he allegedly threw it away, not the other way around.
Three days are the focus of attention, and although they are familiar to the public, they do not bring joy.
And it is here.
What we didn't know, but knew would eventually happen, continued the singer.
I just don't know who is worse off.
If you don't care about them and jump on them, even from a can, or we, who live their lives down to the last detail.
Like if someone wanted to hear your opinion on whether or not you get along with your husband or girlfriend, or if you insist on everyone knowing your full list of former partners and being familiar with the list of your mistakes and failures.
That's what you want, it's a shame for Dar.
The pair met up in Italy, where Rollins was traveling to prepare for her new fashion collection.
Nedvěd has been working as vice president of the football club Juventus for a long time.
They waited until now because they were waiting for Nedved's divorce to be finalized.
They have been separated for three years, but they have only been reunited for three weeks.
We would like to thank those who are happy with us and wish us well.
We are just people, we have families, children, past and dreams.
We're not perfect, but I think we both have our hearts in the right place.
I love my new man just as much as he loves me, and I stand by him just as he stands by me. In good times and bad.
Hi, other commenters have already said most of the important things, I just confirm that the halls are great to start with, my fellow students usually get to know and become friends with each other during the first semester or two and then find shared accommodation, which I think is the best option, because you know who you'll be living with.
Apartments are usually advertised for a long time in advance, so you probably won't find anything right now, but it's worth looking at the listings just to see what's out there.
Otherwise, you should definitely avoid Cejl and its surroundings (streets like Vranovská, French, etc., are pretty bad addresses), and some parts of Žižkov are a bit ghetto.
On the other hand, Veveří is a very student-friendly area, Karlovo Pole is nice, and it's close to most of VUT's faculties (I don't know exactly where you're supposed to get off).
I have never rented a car, but I am a native of Brno, so I may be able to help you with Brno, if you are missing any information.
But that's a completely normal way of thinking.
Because of what some doctors decided to do in Poland, it's actually okay that the state doesn't fund some schools enough.
Either way, learn what you want and pay for it yourself or follow the state's rules and pay the state.
We cannot allow a private actor to control education just because they add a few thousand crowns to the state subsidy, and then they can teach whatever they want in schools.
The statement, however, loses some of its weight when it is written by a person who, two days earlier, had expressed himself in support of the boycott of the totalitarian state:
So, voting against someone going for an abortion is the same as voting against a statue being put up in the square?
I would consult with the person who hired you directly about that.
Otherwise, I have experienced that (and even long-time professionals) it either fits the eye or they write something like xxx *** or ... (according to convention) and add a note that it is unreadable.
The truth is that in this case it is quite readable, so I would not recommend it.
I would have dealt with it in a note, depending on what program you were using.
If you want to be a good and diligent student, you can look up some of the databases and find the nearest one.
But because it looks like you're drawing from a book, I would guess the author or printer simply created their own unique mark that sits alongside the physical coin.
PS: It's not by chance that it's OdryNská (Kingdom) rather than OdryNská?
PSS: Someone has already broken in here.
Comment on the ΦΙΛH post
Politicians don't know what the "theme" of our presidency will be.
That's a lot worse than having a translator with you.
The idea that someone would approve something because they didn't understand a piece of text is laughable.
All the important documents are examined word by word, and even a basic knowledge of English is not enough, this is the job of lawyers.
Hundreds of translators and interpreters work in various institutions of the EU, English is more suitable for informal contacts, establishing extra-ordinary relationships.
And with the English language, it's quite interesting after Brexit.
I don't understand the hate for Chile.
I have been working there for three years now and I am very happy.
I never have any problems leaving work at 10pm.
That it is a ghetto can only be said by someone who has not walked through it in their life.
Yes, most of the Roma population of Brno lives there, but the only thing they do is to block the pavement and park illegally wherever they can :D it's definitely not something you would want to do at night.
So if you're looking for relatively cheap accommodation with good access to the centre, then I'd go for it.
There are now new or newly renovated apartments there.
Felix Slováček (78) without Dáda and Gelemová's girlfriend as a nail in the coffin!
Where do you spend Christmas?
Most people lit the first Advent candle on Saturday, Felix Slováček did not.
I don't have an advent wreath, so there was nothing to light.
I saw a wreath and Lucie definitely has one too, said the saxophonist, who confirmed Patra's words that she often visits her.
He visits but does not live in their house in Vinohrady, where Dada remained alone after his departure.
The Slovak still doesn't know where he will be on Christmas Eve.
Recently, we met with Anička, Felix and their two children.
VIDEO: Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
But we still talked, so Christmas didn't happen.
I don't know where I'll be.
I buy gifts all the time, and I'm sure I'll buy something for Dádě and Lucia, maybe a perfume.
I'm a gentleman, added Felix, who himself came to the Richman club for the music video premiere.
I'm here alone, but I don't feel alone.
He says he always manages to find someone with whom he can have fun, whether it's Luďka Soboty's husband, Adrian, or singer Kamila Nyvltová.
And he was very clear about it.
And we are Iceland, so we can afford to not have soldiers and weapons?
I don't think anyone is going to defend us and our location is so strategic that an aggressor would have to be a complete idiot to take it.
And I don't understand why that should be a bad argument, so can you explain that to me?
I don't know of any other component that could be deployed in hospitals in a crisis.
There are not enough police officers to do it, and the same goes for firefighters, and there is nowhere else in the country where you can get such a high percentage of medically trained people at such a high level.
And the fact that our army is capable of defending Ostrava goes back to the previous governments, not the army, which has been asking for new toys for too long.
Record-breaking drought in the Czech Republic.
It is necessary to change agricultural subsidies, the countryside should not be just a food factory, says the journalist.
The Czech Republic is going through the worst drought in recent years.
According to scientists, water levels have dropped in mountainous and sub-mountainous areas, while smaller amounts of rainfall have been recorded in places where the need for water has not yet been felt.
The drought that is affecting large parts of central Europe is caused by climate change.
But the impacts are also made worse by the way we manage the land.
What are you doing to prepare for the drought?
And how can we help nature in difficult times?
I'll keep my skates sharp, I know what to do in hockey, and I've tried various tactics (what I've tried in Franchise Hockey Manager) and it's all a bit haluz.
And if you are a hockey team called "the bear of Russia" or "the sheep of China" you can still lose by two goals even if you don't have to win at all costs.
But as I listen to the Czech commentators, who are so critical, they are so critical, whether it's men's or women's hockey, it's all so strange, but it's like all sports, UEFA and the "Italian actors" or motorsport F1, WRC, etc.
The controversy is everywhere.
And if it had been the other way around, then it would have been the same as always, and that the Czech Republic usually lost to Russia, then it would have been a classic "they lost" vs "we won".
Coronavirus: Russia's cases exceed 10 million
On Saturday, 11 December, the Czech Republic recorded 9,080 new cases of the disease.
5766 people have been hospitalized.
A total of 34,451 people died in the Czech Republic, and another 74.
In the last 14 days, there have been 1967 confirmed cases in the Czech Republic, and 871 in the last week.
The number of cases in Russia exceeded 10 million on Sunday.
In the last 24 hours, 29,929 new cases have been registered.
It is the lowest daily figure since October 13.
The total number of registered cases of COVID-19 in Russia is 10,016,896.
The daily death toll is 1,132, the lowest since October.
Britain is facing "inevitable" large waves of infection driven by Omicron, said Dr Susan Hopkins, chief medical adviser to the UK Health Security Agency, on Sunday in a television interview.
New quarantine measures will be required.
People infected with the Omicron variant are already being hospitalised in Britain and Hopkins expects their numbers to rise.
So far, no one has died from omicron, but hospitalizations are about fourteen days after infection and deaths are about three weeks after infection.
Labour leader Keir Starmer said on Sunday that Boris Johnson may have broken the law by hosting a Christmas quiz in Downing Street last year, when Christmas parties were banned due to the Covid-19 lockdown.
One minister in Johnson's government defended the quiz being held "virtually" through a computer.
But they were joined by staff gathered around computers in Downing Street.
In Britain, pressure is growing to remove Johnson from the premiership.
During last year's Christmas lockdown, Johnson's ministers held a series of Christmas parties despite the strict lockdown, despite the fact that Christmas parties were banned.
The British public and media are furious that Johnson and his government have been making a mockery of Brexit:
Paul Brand, editor of ITV's commercial television channel for Britain: Two years ago, Boris Johnson won a landslide victory in the general election.
The Conservative Party is now saying that he should be removed from the post of prime minister.
Remarkable how quickly the events unfolded.
Do you want to turn back time and save your skin?
Hungarians are awaiting elections in the spring that could end twelve years of Viktor Orbán's rule.
They will be major European elections.
How can you not expect them to be fair?
They won't be fair.
They will probably not be free either, because they were not free even in the last two elections under Orbán.
Its Fidesz party controls the media, changes electoral boundaries to its advantage, and pulls off smaller or larger tricks.
The last one sounds like everyone can choose where they want to go in practice.
This will allow Fidesz to move voters from decided districts into those where the outcome is uncertain and the opposition could win.
So I'm just saying that they won't.
Do you think it will be the same as in 2014 and 2018?
After all, the situation is very different.
It used to be about whether Fidesz would win, but how many and whether it would have a constitutional majority.
Now there is a real chance that the united opposition will get more votes and seats.
This is a big surprise for Viktor Orbán and his party.
Will they play harder to keep the power?
Yes, we have some indications that they are prepared to go beyond what they have done so far.
Recently, a recording of the president of parliament and one of the leaders of Fidesz, László Kövér, leaked, in which the head of the secret services explains that the opposition is a threat to national security.
Those are the hints of a new approach you are talking about?
Yes, that's one of the new things.
It all starts with language.
I've been hit quite a lot, most recently at the age of 14, my mother doesn't have much patience, neither do I, my grandfather has had it for a long time, but then he gets very angry (only in relation to me).
I was also very temperamental and I was crying like a baby, to the point where I was convulsing on the floor and turning blue, which my parents probably thought twice about taking me to the doctor.
Sometimes they would lecture me, sometimes it was more like they didn't know.
I definitely have a tendency to solve things with violence, as I was quite hurt when I was younger, so I would bite my parents' hands to the point of drawing blood (to avoid getting caught), so I never did anything extreme, but I always felt the need to.
I can't say how much of it is my own impulsiveness, but I'm sure education has a lot to do with it.
I'm afraid I'll also lose my patience with my children and deal with it the same way.
I think hitting children is just wrong and my parents shouldn't have done it, especially at a time when it wasn't "educational," but on the other hand, every parent makes mistakes, so I don't blame them.
It doesn't bother me, I don't understand why he should feel ashamed.
Laws should be clear and unambiguous.
I would call the Kundas those who make laws in such quality.
Otherwise, I would be interested to know if you are worried about the possibility of a payment failure.
Can you really count on the fact that people will want to buy your product and will be willing to pay for it?
Kocner's grandiose world.
Where will Slovakia move with the case of the journalist Kuciak?
The main trial in the case of the four defendants accused of the murder of Jan Kuciak and Martina Kušnírová begins in Slovakia.
The death of the investigative reporter and his partner changed Slovakia.
She exposed the civil society, but also revealed the practices of the accused businessman Marian Kočner and his connections to the top of Slovak politics and justice.
What will the fundamental change mean for Slovakia?
This is something journalists can do.
It is possible that this petition received much more media attention than the petition of the deans of all medical faculties, which was released the next day?
Well, they got sick and the company got rid of them.
COVID-19 was already being reported on Czech television half a year ago.
Another government is ending and the law on involving municipalities in the selection of a storage site is nowhere to be found
Minister Karel Havlíček's proposal needs to be fundamentally revised
The government of Prime Minister Andrej Babiš is coming to an end, and the law, which was supposed to ensure the respect of the interests of municipalities and their citizens when selecting and approving a deep geological repository for high-level radioactive waste, still does not exist.
The Legislative Council has suspended the debate on the proposal, which the Ministry of Industry and Trade submitted to the government after a long series of hearings.
However, it is in conflict with the affected municipalities, which are part of the Platform Against Deep Storage, as well as with the Association of Municipalities and Towns of the Czech Republic.
Local authorities expect to see a significant strengthening of their decision-making powers in relation to waste storage, which has been promised to them since 2011, when the first work on this legislation began and which is also required by the Czech Atomic Act and the European directive.
We expect the new government to revise the proposal in line with its coalition agreement in cooperation with the municipalities.
The proposed law by Minister Karel Havlíček, which the Platform has at its disposal, is criticized by municipalities in particular: The proposed degree of involvement of municipalities and the public in the decision-making process regarding the selection of a location for a storage facility is insufficient and cannot guarantee respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens.
It can only be truly effective if the local authority or the public can influence whether the process will go ahead in a particular location.
This can be achieved by requiring the consent of the affected municipalities before the commencement of the specific proceedings.
The draft proposal almost completely ignores public participation and turns citizens of the towns into mere statistics in the decision-making process.
The proposal lacks system settings for compensation for municipalities for the entire search and selection process for a storage site, its authorization and operation.
Municipal officials have few options when it comes to defending the interests of their citizens when looking for a site for a landfill.
In some permits, people can submit their comments or appeal, but the decision is made by the authority or the minister in whose interest the permit is to be issued.
A pending appeal has no effect on the implementation of exploratory or construction works.
The platform's call for more devolved decision-making is a principle that is widely used in many democratic countries and certainly in those that have already made progress in setting up repositories, such as Sweden and Finland.
The draft law is another failure of the state administration, which hires external legal firms to draft legislation.
In this case, it is a contract with the law firm HAVEL & PARTNERS s.r.o., which SÚRAO has entered into with the lawyer Jan Zemanek.
The total sum for these works is estimated to be around 4 million crowns, according to the register of agreements.
Antonín Seknička, the deputy mayor of the village of Cejle and spokesman for the Platform Against Deep Storage of Radioactive Waste, said: The ministers of industry who shifted the balance of power between local authorities and state authorities in the search for a deep storage site for highly radioactive waste have left it to the new government to take a more decisive step.
We also offer a helping hand.
We also thank the Association of Municipalities and Cities for taking the same stance as the directly affected municipalities in certain locations on the issue of insufficient rights for municipalities.
The Deep Storage Platform brings together 51 members (35 towns and cities and 16 associations) with the aim of changing the state's approach to dealing with nuclear waste and other radioactive waste, which will not be limited to deep storage.
The platform further advocates that the decision on the location for the potential storage should be subject to the prior consent of the affected municipalities.
John Goodman (69) was afraid to lift 90 kg: He lifted 90 kg.
While he didn't need to change his lifestyle for a long time, doctors eventually scared him.
They told him that if he didn't stop, he would die.
And that took care of it.
Goodman gradually lost 90 kilograms, which is half of his original weight of 180 kilograms, the Sun reports.
He celebrated his new character at the premiere of the animated series The Freak Brothers in Los Angeles.
The Roseanne character is completely different from the sitcom!
John liked to joke that his friends and family had begged him to lose weight because his large body was causing furniture to break.
"I've been scratching my way to the top," he said in an interview with AARP in 2018.
This time I wanted to do it slowly.
To move, to practice.
I'm getting to a point where I can't afford to sit still, said Goodman, whose transformation is amazing.
It also depends on what kind of boss and what you want to use the word "boss" for.
If it's a text on a platform that expects players to read, I wouldn't translate it.
If it's a formal text or a university text, I would try to describe or explain it in a more sophisticated way.
There are many different types of bosses.
For example, Dark Souls has several bosses, and yes, they are "bosses" in the sense that they are rulers of a given level, and then there is the final boss...
Many games have hidden bosses (super bosses, hidden bosses) that are not necessary to defeat in order to complete the game or level, but are often much stronger than the standard boss.
Then there are games like Half-Life, where the bosses are there, but the player can't interact with them directly (Tentacle, Gargantua), and can they even be called a game?
And then there are the mini-bosses.
It is impossible to translate "boss" into Czech, English or any other language (interestingly, Catalan translates it as the final opponent).
It's basically a story or game in which a computer-controlled opponent is stronger than all the previous ones and is guarding the completion of some level or task.
The world is searching for lost Peter from London.
The Czech police also got involved.
British police have been searching for missing Peter Srncova since December 3.
The Czech police have also been involved in the search.
The 32-year-old woman from Uherskohradišťsko has been looking for her since December 7.
It also helps the British police.
Petru Srncová was last seen by her colleagues on November 28.
British police have been searching for her since December 3.
Interpol issued a yellow notice for her.
Petře therefore searches the whole world.
"The Czech police cooperate closely with the British police," confirmed police spokeswoman Kateřina Rendlová.
"We are sharing information about the case," she added.
The search for Peter has also been reported on the police website.
She is 168 centimetres tall, is curvy and has brown eyes and long, straight blonde hair of the same colour.
It should have come from Uherskohradišťsko.
Petra worked as a nurse in one of London's hospitals.
Her friends and colleagues are afraid of her, because such a disappearance is very unusual for her
Ms Harman has also been involved in the search for Mr Petre.
She was involved in putting up posters with Petra's face on them.
"We have huge concerns about it," she said at a Saturday press conference.
British police have arrested one suspect in connection with the disappearance.
However, it is not clear who he was with and what he had in common with Petra.
Pre-Christmas Czechia terrorises Agent Tesla.
While data in October showed a slight decline in the number of attacks, the past month has seen an increase in the number of attacks.
We recorded a major campaign related to Agent Tesla on November 18.
The attacks are aimed at the Czech Republic.
The attackers' strategy remains the same.
The infected attachment in the email will alert the user to the fact that it contains references to payments and financial transactions.
Last month, the dangerous attachment in the name of the word "faktura" was marked as "Copy of the invoice for 11.2021...exe," said Martin Jirkal from Eset.
Spyware includes functions that scan Internet browsers and other programs, such as Microsoft Outlook email clients, Mozilla Thunderbird or Yandex.
The malicious code actively looks for stored login credentials and then sends them to the attackers.
The last major campaign took place in the Czech Republic at the end of August and beginning of September, and with the approaching holidays and the end of the year, the number of attacks is increasing again.
In November, the spyware Formbook remained active.
In contrast to Agent Tesla, the attackers in this case are not specifically targeting the Czech Republic and security specialists in November caught more campaigns with a global reach.
Compared to Formbook's October figures, it has slightly weakened, but it still stands at nearly a fifth of all detections.
Attacks continued throughout the month with increased activity on 3, 10 and 15 November.
The most common file extension was .exe, which was named REQUEST FOR SPECIFICATION.
The account name continues to appear, however.
The attachment in Czech can be far more dangerous for a Czech user.
Significant decline and lack of activity in the Fareit program, which accounted for 1.6 percent of attacks and had no major offensive campaign in the Czech Republic in the last few months.
Today's smart-phone-wielding, oxygen-deprived, unvaccinated child.
The Prague tour was bigger than the media reports.
Based on the parade and my experience as a protester, I would guess around 10,000 people.
People filled the embankment and the bridge and the opposite embankment road.
That means a lot of people.
A spontaneous crowd of around 4,000 people joined the march.
I say that something new is being born here, writes Radek Mokrý.
The persistent discontent of several large groups or layers of the population led to the emergence of a common language.
The anti-vaxxers, anti-Rousians and others would not have been able to fill or pay for such a large procession.
The Chcípl pes action is gaining popularity, reminding me of Million Minutes for Democracy.
Sometimes I have the impression that they rent the same podium and equipment.
It is hard to say what movement would be able to benefit from this discontent, not only depends on the amount of money, but also on the fact that the three-dose vaccine from Pfizer will not become a four-dose vaccine.
It won't be a left-wing or centrist movement, you'll see.
A three-dose vaccine will almost certainly become a multi-dose vaccine, since it is clear that we will have to be re-vaccinated every six months.
I am very glad that the vaccines saved us.
A brilliant act of science, which humanity is entitled to be proud of.
Bulgaria has a new prime minister announcing change
Bulgarian President Rumen Radev has appointed Kirill Petkov, leader of the anti-corruption party "We Continue the Change" which won the November elections, to form a new government.
It has managed to put together a broad coalition that should take office in a few days.
The political crisis in the country has been ongoing since April, when the previous government was defeated in elections under the weight of corruption protests.
However, the winning parties that were fighting against corruption and abuse of power were unable to reach an agreement, so there were still two early elections.
What do cats do when nobody is watching?
The "secretly" recorded footage has become a global hit.
In Britain, fears are growing about the fate of the 32-year-old Czech woman, who has been missing for several days in London.
Petra Srncová was last seen two weeks ago when she was driving home from work in the south of the British capital.
She has been contacted by the police as well as her former employer and a London borough councillor, where she lived.
"Petra's disappearance is not at all like her behaviour and we're starting to worry about her," said Lucy O'Connor from the police station in Lambeth, where Srncová worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and simply wants to know where she is," she continued.
The Czech woman left work on Saturday, November 28, around 7:45 p.m. and headed home to Camberwell.
It was reportedly seen again about half an hour later in a bus.
Her disappearance was reported by a colleague on December 3.
She worked as a "nursing assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are extremely concerned for our missing colleague Petra, who is unaccounted for," a group of medical facilities tweeted.
"We would like to appeal to anyone who may have any information that could help them to get in touch with police," the statement continued.
An anonymous person has reported that Zdeňka Dvořáková-Kocourková, an amateur children's room painter, has violated copyright by her paintings.
However, the court ruled that Krtečka's paintings in the Šumperk rooms do not violate the law.
In Ústí nad Labem, a month ago, a hole in the road in the form of a canal without a lid appeared.
It was life.
The magistrate referred the complaints to the RSD, which owns the road, but it didn't respond, so the hole got bigger.
In the end, the authorities clarified responsibility and ownership, and after a month, the RSD "intensively dealt with the situation."
